1676 | sit (verb): to be seated | loc: sedět
  EN TS: Sitting with a coffee? Vibes.
  cz TS: Sedět s kafem? Pohodička.
  EN FS: Sitting with a book? Vibes.
  cz FS: Sedět s knížkou? Pohodička.
  EN TP: sitting in an armchair
  cz TP: sedí v křesle
  EN FP: sitting at a desk
  cz FP: sedí u stolu
1677 | city (noun): a large crowded area of streets and buildings | loc: město
  EN TS: They are not looking at the city.
  cz TS: Na město se nedívají.
  EN FS: They are not looking at their phones.
  cz FS: Na mobily se nedívají.
  EN TP: a city at dusk
  cz TP: město za soumraku
  EN FP: a city at noon
  cz FP: město v poledne
1679 | temple (noun): a building where people pray | loc: chrám
  EN TS: The temple is golden.
  cz TS: Chrám je zlatý.
  EN FS: The temple is silver.
  cz FS: Chrám je stříbrný.
  EN TP: a temple by a pond
  cz TP: chrám u rybníka
  EN FP: a temple in a city
  cz FP: chrám ve městě
1681 | peacock (noun): a large bird with a long shiny blue-green tail | loc: páv
  EN TS: What a long tail, peacock!
  cz TS: Páve, ty máš ale dlouhý ocas!
  EN FS: What a short tail, peacock!
  cz FS: Páve, ty máš ale krátký ocas!
  EN TP: a peacock on a branch
  cz TP: páv na větvi
  EN FP: a peacock on the ground
  cz FP: páv na zemi
1684 | mask (noun): a cover you wear over your face | loc: rouška
  EN TS: Even the Mona Lisa wears a mask now.
  cz TS: I Mona Lisa už nosí roušku.
  EN FS: Even the Mona Lisa wears a hat now.
  cz FS: I Mona Lisa už nosí klobouk.
  EN TP: a white medical mask
  cz TP: bílá lékařská rouška
  EN FP: a mask for a party
  cz FP: maska na večírek
1685 | crowd (noun): a large group of people packed together | loc: dav
  EN TS: The crowd is running away!
  cz TS: Dav utíká pryč!
  EN FS: The crowd is running inside!
  cz FS: Dav utíká dovnitř!
  EN TP: a crowd fleeing the temple
  cz TP: dav prchá z chrámu
  EN FP: a crowd praying inside
  cz FP: dav se modlí uvnitř
1686 | charge (verb): to fill a phone or battery with electricity | loc: nabíjet
  EN TS: He is charging himself.
  cz TS: Nabíjí sám sebe.
  EN FS: He is charging his phone.
  cz FS: Nabíjí si mobil.
  EN TP: charging from a wall socket
  cz TP: nabíjení ze zásuvky
  EN FP: charging a car battery
  cz FP: nabíjení autobaterie
1689 | jesus (noun): the central figure of the Christian faith | loc: Ježíš
  EN TS: Jesus is standing by a cave.
  cz TS: Ježíš stojí u jeskyně.
  EN FS: Jesus is standing by a lake.
  cz FS: Ježíš stojí u jezera.
  EN TP: Jesus by a cave
  cz TP: Ježíš u jeskyně
  EN FP: Jesus by the sea
  cz FP: Ježíš u moře
1693 | knight (noun): a soldier in metal armour from the Middle Ages | loc: rytíř
  EN TS: A knight is swinging a sword.
  cz TS: Rytíř máchá mečem.
  EN FS: A knight is swinging an axe.
  cz FS: Rytíř máchá sekerou.
  EN TP: a knight in armour
  cz TP: rytíř v brnění
  EN FP: a knight on a horse
  cz FP: rytíř na koni
1694 | chief (noun): the leader of a group or tribe | loc: náčelník
  EN TS: The chief wears a feather.
  cz TS: Náčelník má na hlavě pero.
  EN FS: The chief wears a crown.
  cz FS: Náčelník má na hlavě korunu.
  EN TP: a chief with a feather
  cz TP: náčelník s perem
  EN FP: a chief with a crown
  cz FP: náčelník s korunou
1695 | gun (noun): a weapon that fires a bullet at high speed | loc: zbraň
  EN TS: She is holding a gun.
  cz TS: Drží v ruce zbraň.
  EN FS: She is holding a phone.
  cz FS: Drží v ruce mobil.
  EN TP: holding a gun down
  cz TP: drží zbraň sklopenou
  EN FP: holding a gun up
  cz FP: drží zbraň zvednutou
1696 | eagle (noun): a large strong bird that hunts | loc: orel
  EN TS: The eagle manages two chicks.
  cz TS: Orel má na starosti dvě mláďata.
  EN FS: The eagle manages four chicks.
  cz FS: Orel má na starosti čtyři mláďata.
  EN TP: an eagle above its nest
  cz TP: orel nad hnízdem
  EN FP: an eagle catching a fish
  cz FP: orel chytá rybu
1697 | fan (noun): a folding object you wave to move air | loc: vějíř
  EN TS: Fan and kimono: very elegant.
  cz TS: Vějíř a kimono: moc elegantní.
  EN FS: Book and kimono: very elegant.
  cz FS: Kniha a kimono: moc elegantní.
  EN TP: an open folding fan
  cz TP: otevřený skládací vějíř
  EN FP: an electric fan in summer
  cz FP: elektrický větrák v létě
1699 | swim (verb): to move through water with your body | loc: plavat
  EN TS: Someone is swimming to the music.
  cz TS: Někdo plave do rytmu hudby.
  EN FS: Someone is flying to the music.
  cz FS: Někdo letí do rytmu hudby.
  EN TP: swimming across calm water
  cz TP: plave po klidné vodě
  EN FP: swimming in a pool
  cz FP: plave v bazénu
1701 | lily (noun): a tall plant with big trumpet-shaped flowers | loc: lilie
  EN TS: A lily is growing from a jug.
  cz TS: Ze džbánu roste lilie.
  EN FS: A rose is growing from a jug.
  cz FS: Ze džbánu roste růže.
  EN TP: a lily in a jug
  cz TP: lilie ve džbánu
  EN FP: a lily in a pond
  cz FP: lilie v rybníku
1703 | read (verb): to look at written words and understand them | loc: číst | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: She is reading in the air.
  cz TS: Čte si ve vzduchu.
  EN FS: She is sleeping in the air.
  cz FS: Spí ve vzduchu.
  EN TP: reading a glowing book
  cz TP: čte zářící knihu
  EN FP: reading a text message
  cz FP: čte zprávu v mobilu
1704 | christmas (noun): the winter holiday on 25 December | loc: Vánoce
  EN TS: It says 'happy Christmas'.
  cz TS: Stojí tam „Veselé Vánoce“.
  EN FS: It says 'happy birthday'.
  cz FS: Stojí tam „Všechno nejlepší“.
  EN TP: an old Christmas card
  cz TP: stará vánoční pohlednice
  EN FP: an old Christmas tree
  cz FP: starý vánoční stromek
1706 | sunglasses (noun): dark spectacles that protect the eyes from the sun | loc: sluneční brýle
  EN TS: Cool dog, cool sunglasses.
  cz TS: Cool pes, cool sluneční brýle.
  EN FS: Cool dog, cool hat.
  cz FS: Cool pes, cool klobouk.
  EN TP: a husky in sunglasses
  cz TP: husky ve slunečních brýlích
  EN FP: sunglasses on a beach towel
  cz FP: sluneční brýle na osušce
1707 | cottage (noun): a small simple house in the countryside | loc: chalupa
  EN TS: Plants are eating the cottage.
  cz TS: Rostliny žerou chalupu.
  EN FS: Plants are eating the church.
  cz FS: Rostliny žerou kostel.
  EN TP: an overgrown stone cottage
  cz TP: zarostlá kamenná chalupa
  EN FP: a cottage by the sea
  cz FP: chalupa u moře
1709 | teacher (noun): a person whose job is teaching | loc: učitel
  EN TS: The teacher is explaining.
  cz TS: Učitel vysvětluje.
  EN FS: The teacher is sleeping.
  cz FS: Učitel spí.
  EN TP: a teacher at the board
  cz TP: učitel u tabule
  EN FP: a teacher at her desk
  cz FP: učitel za katedrou
1710 | blackboard (noun): a dark wall surface teachers write on in chalk | loc: tabule
  EN TS: The blackboard is empty.
  cz TS: Tabule je prázdná.
  EN FS: The blackboard is full.
  cz FS: Tabule je popsaná.
  EN TP: an empty blackboard
  cz TP: prázdná tabule
  EN FP: a blackboard full of notes
  cz FP: tabule plná poznámek
1711 | skeleton (noun): all the bones of a body together | loc: kostra
  EN TS: The skeleton looks very happy.
  cz TS: Kostra vypadá strašně šťastně.
  EN FS: The skeleton looks very sad.
  cz FS: Kostra vypadá strašně smutně.
  EN TP: a skeleton with a bow
  cz TP: kostra s mašlí
  EN FP: a skeleton in a museum
  cz FP: kostra v muzeu
1713 | feather (noun): one of the light soft things covering a bird | loc: pírko
  EN TS: Hundreds of feathers on top.
  cz TS: Nahoře stovky pírek.
  EN FS: Hundreds of flowers on top.
  cz FS: Nahoře stovky květin.
  EN TP: a headdress of long feathers
  cz TP: čelenka z dlouhých pírek
  EN FP: a pillow full of feathers
  cz FP: polštář plný peří
1716 | spacesuit (noun): the sealed suit an astronaut wears in space | loc: skafandr
  EN TS: The spacesuit is white.
  cz TS: Skafandr je bílý.
  EN FS: The spacesuit is orange.
  cz FS: Skafandr je oranžový.
  EN TP: a white spacesuit
  cz TP: bílý skafandr
  EN FP: a spacesuit on a hanger
  cz FP: skafandr na ramínku
1717 | instrument (noun): an object you play to make music | loc: hudební nástroj
  EN TS: This instrument is a violin.
  cz TS: Tenhle hudební nástroj jsou housle.
  EN FS: This instrument is a guitar.
  cz FS: Tenhle hudební nástroj je kytara.
  EN TP: a string instrument
  cz TP: strunný hudební nástroj
  EN FP: a wind instrument
  cz FP: dechový hudební nástroj
1718 | calm (adjective): quiet, relaxed and not worried at all | loc: klidný
  EN TS: The Buddha is 100 % calm.
  cz TS: Buddha je na 100 % klidný.
  EN FS: The Buddha is 100 % angry.
  cz FS: Buddha je na 100 % naštvaný.
  EN TP: a calm face
  cz TP: klidná tvář
  EN FP: a calm sea
  cz FP: klidné moře
1724 | hold (verb): to have something in your hands or grip | loc: držet
  EN TS: She is holding the moon!
  cz TS: Drží v rukou Měsíc!
  EN FS: She is holding the sun!
  cz FS: Drží v rukou Slunce!
  EN TP: holding the moon
  cz TP: drží Měsíc
  EN FP: holding a poppy
  cz FP: drží mák
1725 | cross (noun): two crossed beams used to crucify someone | loc: kříž
  EN TS: A cross lies on the ground.
  cz TS: Na zemi leží kříž.
  EN FS: A ladder lies on the ground.
  cz FS: Na zemi leží žebřík.
  EN TP: a cross on the ground
  cz TP: kříž na zemi
  EN FP: a cross on a church
  cz FP: kříž na kostele
1726 | cape (noun): a loose sleeveless coat hanging from the shoulders | loc: plášť
  EN TS: She is swirling a red cape.
  cz TS: Víří červeným pláštěm.
  EN FS: She is swirling a red scarf.
  cz FS: Víří červeným šátkem.
  EN TP: swirling a red cape
  cz TP: víří červeným pláštěm
  EN FP: wearing a cape and mask
  cz FP: v plášti a masce
1728 | fan (noun): a folding object you wave to move air | loc: vějíř
  EN TS: Red fan up, leg up!
  cz TS: Červený vějíř nahoru, noha nahoru!
  EN FS: Red hat up, leg up!
  cz FS: Červený klobouk nahoru, noha nahoru!
  EN TP: waving a red fan
  cz TP: mává červeným vějířem
  EN FP: a fan on the ceiling
  cz FP: stropní ventilátor
1729 | pet (noun): an animal kept at home for company | loc: domácí mazlíček
  EN TS: She has two pets.
  cz TS: Má dva domácí mazlíčky.
  EN FS: She has three pets.
  cz FS: Má tři domácí mazlíčky.
  EN TP: a girl with her pets
  cz TP: holka s domácími mazlíčky
  EN FP: a girl buying a pet
  cz FP: holka kupuje mazlíčka
1731 | arrow (noun): the thin feathered stick you shoot from a bow | loc: šíp
  EN TS: An arrow hit her flag!
  cz TS: Šíp zasáhl její vlajku!
  EN FS: An arrow hit her horse!
  cz FS: Šíp zasáhl jejího koně!
  EN TP: arrows in a flag
  cz TP: šípy ve vlajce
  EN FP: arrows in a target
  cz FP: šípy v terči
1733 | elf (noun): a magical creature with pointed ears | loc: elf
  EN TS: Guess what the elf is holding? A light.
  cz TS: Hádej, co drží ten elf? Světlo.
  EN FS: Guess what the elf is holding? A sword.
  cz FS: Hádej, co drží ten elf? Meč.
  EN TP: an elf with pointed ears
  cz TP: elf se špičatýma ušima
  EN FP: an elf with a bow
  cz FP: elf s lukem
1734 | superhero (noun): a caped character with special powers | loc: superhrdina
  EN TS: This superhero is Spider-Man.
  cz TS: Tenhle superhrdina je Spider-Man.
  EN FS: This superhero is Batman.
  cz FS: Tenhle superhrdina je Batman.
  EN TP: a superhero in a mask
  cz TP: superhrdina v masce
  EN FP: a superhero with a cape
  cz FP: superhrdina s pláštěm
1738 | veil (noun): a piece of cloth that covers the head | loc: závoj
  EN TS: She wears a long dark veil.
  cz TS: Má dlouhý tmavý závoj.
  EN FS: She wears a long white veil.
  cz FS: Má dlouhý bílý závoj.
  EN TP: a long dark veil
  cz TP: dlouhý tmavý závoj
  EN FP: a wedding veil
  cz FP: svatební závoj
1741 | emperor (noun): the man who rules a whole empire | loc: císař
  EN TS: The emperor wears a wreath.
  cz TS: Císař má na hlavě věnec.
  EN FS: The emperor wears a crown.
  cz FS: Císař má na hlavě korunu.
  EN TP: an emperor with a wreath
  cz TP: císař s věncem
  EN FP: an emperor on a horse
  cz FP: císař na koni
1742 | shield (noun): a flat piece of armour held for protection | loc: štít
  EN TS: The angel is holding a shield.
  cz TS: Anděl drží štít.
  EN FS: The angel is holding a sword.
  cz FS: Anděl drží meč.
  EN TP: a large round shield
  cz TP: velký kulatý štít
  EN FP: a shield on the ground
  cz FP: štít na zemi
1743 | italy (noun): a country in southern Europe, home of pizza | loc: Itálie
  EN TS: Ice cream in Italy? Of course.
  cz TS: Zmrzlina v Itálii? No jasně.
  EN FS: Pizza in Italy? Of course.
  cz FS: Pizza v Itálii? No jasně.
  EN TP: a leaning tower in Italy
  cz TP: šikmá věž v Itálii
  EN FP: a pizza oven in Italy
  cz FP: pec na pizzu v Itálii
1747 | tent (noun): a shelter of cloth stretched over poles | loc: stan
  EN TS: Best tent spot ever!
  cz TS: Nejlepší místo pro stan vůbec!
  EN FS: Best beach spot ever!
  cz FS: Nejlepší místo na pláži vůbec!
  EN TP: a tent on a hill
  cz TP: stan na kopci
  EN FP: a tent on a beach
  cz FP: stan na pláži
1751 | sign (noun): a big board that shows advertisements | loc: značka
  EN TS: Each sign shows a landscape.
  cz TS: Každá značka ukazuje krajinu.
  EN FS: Each sign shows a city.
  cz FS: Každá značka ukazuje město.
  EN TP: arrow signs with landscapes
  cz TP: směrové značky s krajinou
  EN FP: arrow signs with prices
  cz FP: směrové značky s cenami
1752 | windmill (noun): a building with big sails turned by the wind | loc: větrný mlýn
  EN TS: The windmill windows are lit.
  cz TS: Okna větrného mlýna svítí.
  EN FS: The windmill windows are open.
  cz FS: Okna větrného mlýna jsou otevřená.
  EN TP: a windmill by a lake
  cz TP: větrný mlýn u jezera
  EN FP: a windmill in a field
  cz FP: větrný mlýn v poli
1756 | argue (verb): to speak angrily with someone you disagree with | loc: hádat se
  EN TS: They are arguing on the phone.
  cz TS: Hádají se po telefonu.
  EN FS: They are singing on the phone.
  cz FS: Zpívají si po telefonu.
  EN TP: arguing on the phone
  cz TP: hádají se po telefonu
  EN FP: arguing in the kitchen
  cz FP: hádají se v kuchyni
1757 | blossom (noun): a flower on a tree, like cherry blossom | loc: květ
  EN TS: Music under the blossoms? Romantic.
  cz TS: Hudba pod květy třešní? Romantika.
  EN FS: Dancing under the blossoms? Romantic.
  cz FS: Tanec pod květy třešní? Romantika.
  EN TP: pink cherry blossoms
  cz TP: růžové květy třešní
  EN FP: cherry blossom tea
  cz FP: čaj z třešňových květů
1762 | whale (noun): a huge sea animal that breathes air | loc: velryba
  EN TS: A man is falling into a whale!
  cz TS: Muž padá do velryby!
  EN FS: A man is falling into a boat!
  cz FS: Muž padá do lodi!
  EN TP: the mouth of a whale
  cz TP: tlama velryby
  EN FP: a whale in an aquarium
  cz FP: velryba v akváriu
1765 | greedy (adjective): wanting far more money than you need | loc: chamtivý
  EN TS: So greedy! Hands off the gold!
  cz TS: Tak chamtivý! Ruce pryč od zlata!
  EN FS: So greedy! Hands off the cake!
  cz FS: Tak chamtivý! Ruce pryč od dortu!
  EN TP: a greedy man with coins
  cz TP: chamtivý muž s mincemi
  EN FP: a greedy dog with food
  cz FP: chamtivý pes s jídlem
1766 | blackberry (noun): a dark fruit made of many little parts | loc: ostružina
  EN TS: Black and red blackberries.
  cz TS: Černé a červené ostružiny.
  EN FS: Black and green blackberries.
  cz FS: Černé a zelené ostružiny.
  EN TP: ripe blackberries on a branch
  cz TP: zralé ostružiny na větvi
  EN FP: blackberries in a pie
  cz FP: ostružiny v koláči
1777 | banjo (noun): a round-bodied string instrument | loc: banjo
  EN TS: This dude is playing the banjo.
  cz TS: Tenhle týpek hraje na banjo.
  EN FS: This dude is playing the drums.
  cz FS: Tenhle týpek hraje na bicí.
  EN TP: playing a banjo
  cz TP: hraje na banjo
  EN FP: tuning a banjo
  cz FP: ladí banjo
1779 | chain (noun): a row of metal rings joined together | loc: řetěz
  EN TS: His chain is out of control!
  cz TS: Jeho řetěz se vymkl kontrole!
  EN FS: His rope is out of control!
  cz FS: Jeho lano se vymklo kontrole!
  EN TP: a chain whipping around him
  cz TP: řetěz svištící kolem něj
  EN FP: a chain around his neck
  cz FP: řetěz na krku
1780 | bike (noun): a vehicle with two wheels that you pedal | loc: kolo
  EN TS: A dog is chasing his bike!
  cz TS: Pes honí jeho kolo!
  EN FS: A cat is chasing his bike!
  cz FS: Kočka honí jeho kolo!
  EN TP: a bike ride downhill
  cz TP: jízda na kole z kopce
  EN FP: a bike ride uphill
  cz FP: jízda na kole do kopce
1781 | halloween (noun): the autumn night of scary costumes and pumpkins | loc: Halloween
  EN TS: Halloween every day in this house.
  cz TS: V tomhle domě je Halloween každý den.
  EN FS: Halloween every day in this castle.
  cz FS: V tomhle hradě je Halloween každý den.
  EN TP: a Halloween haunted house
  cz TP: halloweenský strašidelný dům
  EN FP: a Halloween party at school
  cz FP: halloweenská párty ve škole
1783 | child (noun): a young person, a boy or a girl | loc: dítě
  EN TS: Four children, one lap, a hug for each child.
  cz TS: Čtyři děti, jeden klín, objetí pro každé dítě.
  EN FS: Four children, one lap, a gift for each child.
  cz FS: Čtyři děti, jeden klín, dárek pro každé dítě.
  EN TP: a man hugging each child
  cz TP: muž objímá každé dítě
  EN FP: a man teaching each child
  cz FP: muž učí každé dítě
1785 | beautiful (adjective): delighting the senses, very nice to look at | loc: krásný
  EN TS: This is a beautiful drawing.
  cz TS: Tohle je krásná kresba.
  EN FS: This is a beautiful photo.
  cz FS: Tohle je krásná fotka.
  EN TP: a beautiful portrait
  cz TP: krásný portrét
  EN FP: a beautiful sunset
  cz FP: krásný západ slunce
1786 | meteor (noun): a space rock that burns as it falls | loc: meteor
  EN TS: Meteors are falling like rain.
  cz TS: Meteory padají jako déšť.
  EN FS: Leaves are falling like rain.
  cz FS: Listí padá jako déšť.
  EN TP: meteors raining down
  cz TP: déšť meteorů
  EN FP: a meteor in a museum
  cz FP: meteor v muzeu
1787 | streetlight (noun): a tall lamp that lights a street at night | loc: pouliční lampa
  EN TS: Red scarf under a streetlight. Stylish.
  cz TS: Červená šála pod pouliční lampou. Stylové.
  EN FS: Blue scarf under a streetlight. Stylish.
  cz FS: Modrá šála pod pouliční lampou. Stylové.
  EN TP: a glowing streetlight
  cz TP: zářící pouliční lampa
  EN FP: a broken streetlight
  cz FP: rozbitá pouliční lampa
1788 | monster (noun): a frightening creature that is not real | loc: monstrum
  EN TS: A sea monster with passengers!
  cz TS: Mořské monstrum s pasažéry!
  EN FS: A sea turtle with passengers!
  cz FS: Mořská želva s pasažéry!
  EN TP: a sea monster rising
  cz TP: mořské monstrum se vynořuje
  EN FP: a monster under the bed
  cz FP: monstrum pod postelí
1792 | build (verb): to make something by combining parts | loc: stavět
  EN TS: They are building a tower.
  cz TS: Staví věž.
  EN FS: They are building a ship.
  cz FS: Staví loď.
  EN TP: to build a huge tower
  cz TP: stavět obří věž
  EN FP: to build a small house
  cz FP: stavět malý domek
1794 | feather (noun): one of the light soft things covering a bird | loc: pírko
  EN TS: So many peacock feathers!
  cz TS: Tolik pavích pírek!
  EN FS: So many swan feathers!
  cz FS: Tolik labutích pírek!
  EN TP: shimmering peacock feathers
  cz TP: třpytivá paví pírka
  EN FP: a feather in a pillow
  cz FP: pírko v polštáři
1799 | cello (noun): a large string instrument played sitting down | loc: violoncello
  EN TS: The cello is the largest one.
  cz TS: Violoncello je z nich největší.
  EN FS: The violin is the largest one.
  cz FS: Housle jsou z nich největší.
  EN TP: a large dark cello
  cz TP: velké tmavé violoncello
  EN FP: a small dark cello
  cz FP: malé tmavé violoncello
1800 | hide (verb): to keep yourself or something from being seen | loc: schovat se
  EN TS: They are hiding a smile.
  cz TS: Schovávají úsměv.
  EN FS: They are hiding a phone.
  cz FS: Schovávají mobil.
  EN TP: hiding behind a book
  cz TP: schovává se za knihou
  EN FP: hiding under a table
  cz FP: schovává se pod stolem
1802 | note (noun): a sign for a single sound in written music | loc: nota
  EN TS: Notes are pouring out of the guitar!
  cz TS: Z kytary se valí noty!
  EN FS: Coins are pouring out of the guitar!
  cz FS: Z kytary se valí mince!
  EN TP: a waterfall of notes
  cz TP: vodopád not
  EN FP: a stack of notes
  cz FP: štos poznámek
1803 | throw (verb): to send something through the air | loc: hodit
  EN TS: He is going to throw the ball.
  cz TS: Chystá se hodit míč.
  EN FS: He is going to kick the ball.
  cz FS: Chystá se kopnout do míče.
  EN TP: about to throw the ball
  cz TP: chystá se hodit míč
  EN FP: to throw a party
  cz FP: uspořádat párty
1806 | bun (noun): hair twisted into a round knot on the head | loc: drdol
  EN TS: Two buns? She is so trendy.
  cz TS: Dva drdoly? Ta je tak in.
  EN FS: Two bows? She is so trendy.
  cz FS: Dvě mašle? Ta je tak in.
  EN TP: hair in two round buns
  cz TP: vlasy ve dvou drdolech
  EN FP: two buns on a plate
  cz FP: dvě buchty na talíři
1807 | skull (noun): the bones that form the head | loc: lebka
  EN TS: Skulls are floating around her.
  cz TS: Kolem ní se vznášejí lebky.
  EN FS: Hearts are floating around her.
  cz FS: Kolem ní se vznášejí srdíčka.
  EN TP: skulls in pink flames
  cz TP: lebky v růžových plamenech
  EN FP: skulls on a pirate flag
  cz FP: lebky na pirátské vlajce
1808 | headset (noun): a device worn on the head over eyes or ears | loc: náhlavní souprava
  EN TS: His headset is huge, bro.
  cz TS: Ta jeho náhlavní souprava je obří, kámo.
  EN FS: His hat is huge, bro.
  cz FS: Ta jeho čepice je obří, kámo.
  EN TP: a chunky headset
  cz TP: masivní náhlavní souprava
  EN FP: a headset on a pilot
  cz FP: pilot s náhlavní soupravou
1811 | raincoat (noun): a waterproof coat you wear in the rain | loc: pláštěnka
  EN TS: The raincoat is doing its job.
  cz TS: Pláštěnka plní svou funkci.
  EN FS: The umbrella is doing its job.
  cz FS: Deštník plní svou funkci.
  EN TP: a long yellow raincoat
  cz TP: dlouhá žlutá pláštěnka
  EN FP: a raincoat on a hook
  cz FP: pláštěnka na věšáku
1812 | look (verb): to turn your eyes toward something | loc: dívat se
  EN TS: The cat is looking out too.
  cz TS: Kočka se taky dívá ven.
  EN FS: The dog is looking out too.
  cz FS: Pes se taky dívá ven.
  EN TP: looking out of the window
  cz TP: dívá se z okna
  EN FP: to look after a cat
  cz FP: hlídá kočku
1823 | lonely (adjective): sad because you are all alone | loc: osamělý
  EN TS: She feels lonely tonight.
  cz TS: Dnes večer se cítí osamělá.
  EN FS: She feels lonely this morning.
  cz FS: Dnes ráno se cítí osamělá.
  EN TP: lonely on a balcony
  cz TP: osamělá na balkoně
  EN FP: lonely in a crowd
  cz FP: osamělá v davu
1827 | math (noun): the study of numbers and shapes | loc: matematika
  EN TS: The cat hates math.
  cz TS: Kočka nesnáší matematiku.
  EN FS: The dog hates math.
  cz FS: Pes nesnáší matematiku.
  EN TP: walls covered in math
  cz TP: stěny popsané matematikou
  EN FP: math books on the floor
  cz FP: učebnice matematiky na podlaze
1831 | light bulb (noun): a glass ball in a lamp that glows when switched on | loc: žárovka
  EN TS: A cabin is in the light bulb.
  cz TS: V žárovce je chatka.
  EN FS: A cabin is in the teacup.
  cz FS: V šálku je chatka.
  EN TP: a snowy light bulb
  cz TP: zasněžená žárovka
  EN FP: a broken light bulb
  cz FP: rozbitá žárovka
1832 | take a photo (phrase): to make a picture with a camera or phone | loc: vyfotit | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: She is taking a photo. Cool!
  cz TS: Fotí si to. Paráda!
  EN FS: She is making a call. Cool!
  cz FS: Telefonuje. Paráda!
  EN TP: taking a photo at night
  cz TP: fotí v noci
  EN FP: taking a photo indoors
  cz FP: fotí uvnitř
1833 | lean (verb): to rest your body sideways on something | loc: opřít se | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: He is leaning on his guitar.
  cz TS: Opírá se o kytaru.
  EN FS: He is leaning on his piano.
  cz FS: Opírá se o klavír.
  EN TP: leaning on a guitar
  cz TP: opřený o kytaru
  EN FP: leaning on a tree
  cz FP: opřený o strom
1834 | teach (verb): to help someone learn a skill or subject | loc: učit | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: A god is teaching a warrior.
  cz TS: Bůh učí válečníka.
  EN FS: A god is teaching a child.
  cz FS: Bůh učí dítě.
  EN TP: teaching a warrior
  cz TP: učí válečníka
  EN FP: teaching a crowd
  cz FP: učí dav
1840 | machine (noun): a thing with moving metal parts built to work | loc: stroj
  EN TS: A giant machine made of gears!
  cz TS: Obří stroj z ozubených kol!
  EN FS: A giant machine made of wood!
  cz FS: Obří stroj ze dřeva!
  EN TP: a machine of rusty gears
  cz TP: stroj z rezavých ozubených kol
  EN FP: a coffee machine
  cz FP: kávovar
1843 | neighborhood (noun): the streets and houses around your home | loc: čtvrť
  EN TS: A snowy neighborhood at night.
  cz TS: Zasněžená čtvrť v noci.
  EN FS: A snowy neighborhood at noon.
  cz FS: Zasněžená čtvrť v poledne.
  EN TP: a snowy neighborhood
  cz TP: zasněžená čtvrť
  EN FP: a neighborhood party
  cz FP: párty ve čtvrti
1846 | crane (noun): a large white bird with a long neck and legs | loc: jeřáb
  EN TS: A crane is flying by the sun.
  cz TS: Jeřáb letí před sluncem.
  EN FS: A crane is flying by the moon.
  cz FS: Jeřáb letí před měsícem.
  EN TP: a flying white crane
  cz TP: letící bílý jeřáb
  EN FP: a crane lifting boxes
  cz FP: jeřáb zvedá bedny
1847 | christmas tree (noun): a pine decorated with lights for the holidays | loc: vánoční stromek
  EN TS: I count three Christmas trees.
  cz TS: Počítám tři vánoční stromky.
  EN FS: I count five Christmas trees.
  cz FS: Počítám pět vánočních stromků.
  EN TP: three little Christmas trees
  cz TP: tři malé vánoční stromky
  EN FP: a Christmas tree with gifts
  cz FP: vánoční stromek s dárky
1849 | magic (noun): power that makes impossible things happen | loc: magie
  EN TS: Her magic is glowing!
  cz TS: Její magie září!
  EN FS: Her hair is glowing!
  cz FS: Její vlasy září!
  EN TP: glowing blue magic
  cz TP: zářící modrá magie
  EN FP: a magic card trick
  cz FP: karetní kouzlo
1851 | valley (noun): the low land between mountains | loc: údolí
  EN TS: Mist swallows the valleys.
  cz TS: Mlha polyká údolí.
  EN FS: Snow swallows the valleys.
  cz FS: Sníh polyká údolí.
  EN TP: mist in the valley
  cz TP: mlha v údolí
  EN FP: a valley full of houses
  cz FP: údolí plné domů
1853 | dragon (noun): a huge scaly beast from old stories | loc: drak
  EN TS: The dragon is breathing fire.
  cz TS: Drak chrlí oheň.
  EN FS: The dragon is breathing ice.
  cz FS: Drak chrlí led.
  EN TP: a small white dragon
  cz TP: malý bílý drak
  EN FP: a big green dragon
  cz FP: velký zelený drak
1854 | string (noun): one of the thin wires you pluck on a guitar | loc: struna
  EN TS: The guitar has white strings.
  cz TS: Kytara má bílé struny.
  EN FS: The guitar has black strings.
  cz FS: Kytara má černé struny.
  EN TP: white strings on a guitar
  cz TP: bílé struny na kytaře
  EN FP: white strings on a kite
  cz FP: bílé provázky na draku
1855 | tail (noun): the part at the back end of an animal's body | loc: ocas
  EN TS: The peacock has a huge tail!
  cz TS: Páv má obrovský ocas!
  EN FS: The peacock has a short tail!
  cz FS: Páv má krátký ocas!
  EN TP: a peacock showing its tail
  cz TP: páv ukazuje ocas
  EN FP: a peacock hiding its tail
  cz FP: páv schovává ocas
1856 | tiny (adjective): very, very small | loc: maličký
  EN TS: The figure is tiny. The sky is big.
  cz TS: Postavička je maličká. Nebe je velké.
  EN FS: The figure is huge. The sky is big.
  cz FS: Postavička je obří. Nebe je velké.
  EN TP: a tiny figure on grass
  cz TP: maličká postavička v trávě
  EN FP: a tiny shelf figure
  cz FP: maličká figurka na poličce
1857 | easter (noun): the spring holiday when Christians remember Jesus | loc: Velikonoce
  EN TS: This is an Easter poster.
  cz TS: Tohle je plakát na Velikonoce.
  EN FS: This is a Christmas poster.
  cz FS: Tohle je plakát na Vánoce.
  EN TP: an Easter poster
  cz TP: plakát k Velikonocům
  EN FP: an Easter egg hunt
  cz FP: hledání velikonočních vajíček
1858 | scarf (noun): a long piece of cloth you wear around your neck | loc: šála
  EN TS: The child has a long scarf and a big balloon.
  cz TS: Dítě má dlouhou šálu a velký balónek.
  EN FS: The child has a long sword and a big balloon.
  cz FS: Dítě má dlouhý meč a velký balónek.
  EN TP: a long striped scarf
  cz TP: dlouhá pruhovaná šála
  EN FP: a scarf in a drawer
  cz FP: šála v šuplíku
1860 | stack (noun): a neat pile of things placed on top of each other | loc: hromada
  EN TS: His head is a stack of books.
  cz TS: Jeho hlava je hromada knih.
  EN FS: His head is a stack of plates.
  cz FS: Jeho hlava je hromada talířů.
  EN TP: a stack of books
  cz TP: hromada knih
  EN FP: a stack of boxes
  cz FP: hromada krabic
1861 | antique (adjective): old, valuable and from an earlier time | loc: starožitný
  EN TS: This antique seat has a swan.
  cz TS: Na téhle starožitné židli je labuť.
  EN FS: This antique seat has a lion.
  cz FS: Na téhle starožitné židli je lev.
  EN TP: an antique carved seat
  cz TP: starožitná vyřezávaná židle
  EN FP: an antique carved clock
  cz FP: starožitné vyřezávané hodiny
1862 | vase (noun): a container you put flowers in | loc: váza
  EN TS: The vase has pink roses.
  cz TS: Ve váze jsou růžové růže.
  EN FS: The vase has white roses.
  cz FS: Ve váze jsou bílé růže.
  EN TP: a grey classical vase
  cz TP: šedá klasická váza
  EN FP: a broken classical vase
  cz FP: rozbitá klasická váza
1863 | hang (verb): to attach something high up so it drops down | loc: viset
  EN TS: The swing hangs from the moon!
  cz TS: Houpačka visí z Měsíce!
  EN FS: The swing hangs from a tree!
  cz FS: Houpačka visí ze stromu!
  EN TP: hanging from the moon
  cz TP: visí z Měsíce
  EN FP: hanging from a tree
  cz FP: visí ze stromu
1865 | fin (noun): the thin part a fish uses to swim | loc: ploutev
  EN TS: Those blue fins? Pure fashion.
  cz TS: Ty modré ploutve? Čistá móda.
  EN FS: Those red fins? Pure fashion.
  cz FS: Ty červené ploutve? Čistá móda.
  EN TP: big flowing fins
  cz TP: velké vlající ploutve
  EN FP: fins on a diver
  cz FP: ploutve na potápěči
1866 | spy (noun): a person who secretly finds out information | loc: špion
  EN TS: Sunglasses and a gun: a classic spy.
  cz TS: Sluneční brýle a pistole: klasický špion.
  EN FS: Sunglasses and a knife: a classic spy.
  cz FS: Sluneční brýle a nůž: klasický špion.
  EN TP: a spy with a pistol
  cz TP: špion s pistolí
  EN FP: a spy with a camera
  cz FP: špion s foťákem
1868 | justice (noun): fair treatment of people by the law | loc: spravedlnost
  EN TS: Justice needs a lot of heavy books.
  cz TS: Spravedlnost potřebuje spoustu tlustých knih.
  EN FS: Justice needs a lot of candles.
  cz FS: Spravedlnost potřebuje spoustu svíček.
  EN TP: the scales of justice
  cz TP: váhy spravedlnosti
  EN FP: the sword of justice
  cz FP: meč spravedlnosti
1870 | hair (noun): the threadlike growth covering the head | loc: vlasy
  EN TS: Her hair reaches her feet!
  cz TS: Vlasy jí sahají až k nohám!
  EN FS: Her hair reaches her chin!
  cz FS: Vlasy jí sahají až k bradě!
  EN TP: very long dark hair
  cz TP: velmi dlouhé tmavé vlasy
  EN FP: a hair in the soup
  cz FP: vlas v polévce
1871 | glow (verb): to shine with a soft light | loc: zářit
  EN TS: Her eye is glowing white.
  cz TS: Oko jí září bíle.
  EN FS: Her eye is glowing red.
  cz FS: Oko jí září červeně.
  EN TP: an eye glowing white
  cz TP: bíle zářící oko
  EN FP: a lamp glowing white
  cz FP: bíle zářící lampa
1872 | black (adjective): having the darkest color, like night | loc: černá
  EN TS: The black cat loves books.
  cz TS: Černá kočka miluje knihy.
  EN FS: The white cat loves books.
  cz FS: Bílá kočka miluje knihy.
  EN TP: a black cat on books
  cz TP: černá kočka na knihách
  EN FP: a black cat outside
  cz FP: černá kočka venku
1874 | pier (noun): a wooden platform built out over the water | loc: molo
  EN TS: They are sitting on the pier.
  cz TS: Sedí na molu.
  EN FS: They are sitting on the boat.
  cz FS: Sedí na lodi.
  EN TP: sitting on a pier
  cz TP: sedí na molu
  EN FP: sitting on a bridge
  cz FP: sedí na mostě
1876 | fishbowl (noun): a round glass bowl where pet fish live | loc: kulaté akvárium
  EN TS: Cheap helmet: a fishbowl.
  cz TS: Levná helma: kulaté akvárium.
  EN FS: Cheap helmet: a bucket.
  cz FS: Levná helma: kbelík.
  EN TP: a fishbowl on her head
  cz TP: kulaté akvárium na hlavě
  EN FP: a fishbowl on the table
  cz FP: kulaté akvárium na stole
1878 | invisible (adjective): impossible to see with your eyes | loc: neviditelný
  EN TS: His head is invisible!
  cz TS: Jeho hlava je neviditelná!
  EN FS: His suit is invisible!
  cz FS: Jeho oblek je neviditelný!
  EN TP: an invisible head
  cz TP: neviditelná hlava
  EN FP: an invisible hand
  cz FP: neviditelná ruka
1879 | dome (noun): a round roof shaped like half a ball | loc: kupole
  EN TS: The dome shines like gold.
  cz TS: Kupole se leskne jako zlato.
  EN FS: The dome shines like silver.
  cz FS: Kupole se leskne jako stříbro.
  EN TP: a golden dome
  cz TP: zlatá kupole
  EN FP: a glass dome
  cz FP: skleněná kupole
1880 | invention (noun): a new machine that someone has created | loc: vynález
  EN TS: Best invention ever: a flying ship.
  cz TS: Nejlepší vynález všech dob: létající loď.
  EN FS: Best invention ever: a flying car.
  cz FS: Nejlepší vynález všech dob: létající auto.
  EN TP: a flying invention
  cz TP: létající vynález
  EN FP: an invention on wheels
  cz FP: vynález na kolečkách
1881 | meditate (verb): to sit quietly and calm your mind | loc: meditovat
  EN TS: She is meditating calmly.
  cz TS: Klidně medituje.
  EN FS: She is sleeping calmly.
  cz FS: Klidně spí.
  EN TP: meditating in lotus position
  cz TP: medituje v lotosovém sedu
  EN FP: meditating before an exam
  cz FP: medituje před zkouškou
1883 | hen (noun): a female chicken | loc: slepice
  EN TS: The hens are eating outside.
  cz TS: Slepice zobou venku.
  EN FS: The hens are eating inside.
  cz FS: Slepice zobou uvnitř.
  EN TP: hens in a farmyard
  cz TP: slepice na dvoře
  EN FP: hens in a kitchen
  cz FP: slepice v kuchyni
1884 | reflection (noun): the mirror image seen in water or glass | loc: odraz
  EN TS: The reflection is upside down.
  cz TS: Odraz je vzhůru nohama.
  EN FS: The reflection is very blurry.
  cz FS: Odraz je hodně rozmazaný.
  EN TP: a reflection in still water
  cz TP: odraz na klidné hladině
  EN FP: a reflection in a mirror
  cz FP: odraz v zrcadle
1885 | rich (adjective): having a lot of money and material wealth | loc: bohatý
  EN TS: The rich man is on top.
  cz TS: Bohatý muž je nahoře.
  EN FS: The rich man is at the bottom.
  cz FS: Bohatý muž je dole.
  EN TP: a rich man on top
  cz TP: bohatý muž nahoře
  EN FP: a rich man in prison
  cz FP: bohatý muž ve vězení
1886 | consumer (noun): a person who buys and uses goods | loc: spotřebitel
  EN TS: The consumer's plate is empty.
  cz TS: Talíř spotřebitele je prázdný.
  EN FS: The consumer's plate is full.
  cz FS: Talíř spotřebitele je plný.
  EN TP: a hungry consumer
  cz TP: hladový spotřebitel
  EN FP: a consumer in a shop
  cz FP: spotřebitel v obchodě
1887 | push (verb): to move something with force | loc: tlačit
  EN TS: He is pushing a heavy cart.
  cz TS: Tlačí těžký vozík.
  EN FS: He is pushing a heavy car.
  cz FS: Tlačí těžké auto.
  EN TP: pushing an overloaded cart
  cz TP: tlačí přeplněný vozík
  EN FP: pushing a baby buggy
  cz FP: tlačí kočárek
1889 | move (verb): to change location, to travel or proceed | loc: hýbat se
  EN TS: She is moving like lightning!
  cz TS: Hýbe se jako blesk!
  EN FS: She is sitting like a statue!
  cz FS: Sedí jako socha!
  EN TP: moving to the music
  cz TP: hýbe se do rytmu
  EN FP: moving to a new flat
  cz FP: stěhuje se do nového bytu
1892 | old (adjective): having lived for a long time | loc: starý
  EN TS: The old man has a thin stick.
  cz TS: Starý muž má tenkou hůl.
  EN FS: The old man has an umbrella.
  cz FS: Starý muž má deštník.
  EN TP: the old man's stick
  cz TP: hůl starého muže
  EN FP: the old man's umbrella
  cz FP: deštník starého muže
1894 | hedgehog (noun): a small animal covered in sharp spines | loc: ježek
  EN TS: Sleep well, little hedgehogs.
  cz TS: Dobrou noc, malí ježci.
  EN FS: Sleep well, little rabbits.
  cz FS: Dobrou noc, malí králíčci.
  EN TP: a hedgehog family in bed
  cz TP: rodinka ježků v posteli
  EN FP: a hedgehog in a garden
  cz FP: ježek na zahradě
1897 | pumpkin (noun): a big round orange vegetable with thick skin | loc: dýně
  EN TS: The crow owns these pumpkins.
  cz TS: Tyhle dýně patří vráně.
  EN FS: The cat owns these pumpkins.
  cz FS: Tyhle dýně patří kočce.
  EN TP: three stacked pumpkins
  cz TP: tři dýně na sobě
  EN FP: a pumpkin pie
  cz FP: dýňový koláč
1899 | ruins (noun): the broken remains of old buildings | loc: ruiny
  EN TS: Two giants sit near the ruins.
  cz TS: U ruin sedí dva obři.
  EN FS: Two lions sit near the ruins.
  cz FS: U ruin sedí dva lvi.
  EN TP: ruins of old temples
  cz TP: ruiny starých chrámů
  EN FP: ruins of a castle
  cz FP: ruiny hradu
1905 | curious (adjective): wanting to know what is going on | loc: zvědavý
  EN TS: These cats are so curious!
  cz TS: Ty kočky jsou tak zvědavé!
  EN FS: These dogs are so curious!
  cz FS: Ti psi jsou tak zvědaví!
  EN TP: three curious cats
  cz TP: tři zvědavé kočky
  EN FP: three sleepy cats
  cz FP: tři ospalé kočky
1906 | blue (adjective): the color between green and violet | loc: modrá
  EN TS: Her hair is blue.
  cz TS: Vlasy má modré.
  EN FS: Her hair is red.
  cz FS: Vlasy má červené.
  EN TP: long blue hair
  cz TP: dlouhé modré vlasy
  EN FP: a blue summer dress
  cz FP: modré letní šaty
1908 | heron (noun): a tall water bird with long legs and beak | loc: volavka
  EN TS: Bro, the heron is chilling.
  cz TS: Brácho, volavka si dává chill.
  EN FS: Bro, the swan is chilling.
  cz FS: Brácho, labuť si dává chill.
  EN TP: a heron on a branch
  cz TP: volavka na větvi
  EN FP: a heron in the water
  cz FP: volavka ve vodě
1909 | blade (noun): the flat cutting part of a knife | loc: čepel
  EN TS: Her blade is shining.
  cz TS: Její čepel se blýská.
  EN FS: Her blade is rusty.
  cz FS: Její čepel je rezavá.
  EN TP: a long steel blade
  cz TP: dlouhá ocelová čepel
  EN FP: a short broken blade
  cz FP: krátká zlomená čepel
1910 | petal (noun): one of the soft colored parts of a flower | loc: okvětní lístek
  EN TS: She has so many pink petals.
  cz TS: Má fakt hodně růžových okvětních lístků.
  EN FS: She has so many pink feathers.
  cz FS: Má fakt hodně růžových pírek.
  EN TP: large pink petals
  cz TP: velké růžové okvětní lístky
  EN FP: petals on the floor
  cz FP: okvětní lístky na zemi
1911 | princess (noun): the daughter of a king or queen | loc: princezna
  EN TS: This princess has great style.
  cz TS: Tahle princezna má skvělý styl.
  EN FS: This prince has great style.
  cz FS: Tenhle princ má skvělý styl.
  EN TP: a princess in blue
  cz TP: princezna v modrém
  EN FP: a princess in red
  cz FP: princezna v červeném
1912 | tattoo (noun): a permanent picture inked into the skin | loc: tetování
  EN TS: Her tattoos are blue.
  cz TS: Její tetování jsou modrá.
  EN FS: Her tattoos are red.
  cz FS: Její tetování jsou červená.
  EN TP: swirling blue face tattoos
  cz TP: modrá vířivá tetování na tváři
  EN FP: a tattoo on her hand
  cz FP: tetování na ruce
1914 | piano (noun): a large instrument you play by pressing keys | loc: klavír
  EN TS: The piano is open. Hungry?
  cz TS: Klavír je otevřený. Hlad?
  EN FS: The door is open. Hungry?
  cz FS: Dveře jsou otevřené. Hlad?
  EN TP: an open grand piano
  cz TP: otevřený koncertní klavír
  EN FP: a piano lesson
  cz FP: hodina klavíru
1915 | bass (noun): the biggest string instrument, deepest sound | loc: kontrabas
  EN TS: The bass has four strings.
  cz TS: Kontrabas má čtyři struny.
  EN FS: The bass has six strings.
  cz FS: Kontrabas má šest strun.
  EN TP: a bass with four strings
  cz TP: kontrabas se čtyřmi strunami
  EN FP: a bass with six strings
  cz FP: kontrabas se šesti strunami
1916 | ufo (noun): a flying object believed to come from space | loc: UFO
  EN TS: There are UFOs in the sky.
  cz TS: Na obloze jsou UFO.
  EN FS: There are birds in the sky.
  cz FS: Na obloze jsou ptáci.
  EN TP: UFOs in the sky
  cz TP: UFO na obloze
  EN FP: a UFO landing
  cz FP: přistávající UFO
1917 | speed (noun): how fast something moves, distance per time | loc: rychlost
  EN TS: A helmet designed for speed.
  cz TS: Helma navržená pro rychlost.
  EN FS: A helmet designed for cycling.
  cz FS: Helma navržená pro cyklistiku.
  EN TP: a helmet built for speed
  cz TP: helma stavěná na rychlost
  EN FP: speed on a bicycle
  cz FP: rychlost na kole
1919 | narrow (adjective): not wide, small from side to side | loc: úzký
  EN TS: The lane is very narrow.
  cz TS: Ulička je hodně úzká.
  EN FS: The lane is very wide.
  cz FS: Ulička je hodně široká.
  EN TP: a narrow cobblestone lane
  cz TP: úzká dlážděná ulička
  EN FP: a narrow escape
  cz FP: únik o vlásek
1920 | cyborg (noun): a being that is part human, part machine | loc: kyborg
  EN TS: The cyborg has a glowing head.
  cz TS: Kyborg má zářící hlavu.
  EN FS: The cyborg has a glowing tail.
  cz FS: Kyborg má zářící ocas.
  EN TP: a neon city cyborg
  cz TP: kyborg z neonového města
  EN FP: a cyborg in a forest
  cz FP: kyborg v lese
1921 | shocked (adjective): very surprised and upset by something bad | loc: šokovaný
  EN TS: A shocked face by the water.
  cz TS: Šokovaný obličej u vody.
  EN FS: A shocked face in the forest.
  cz FS: Šokovaný obličej v lese.
  EN TP: a shocked, screaming face
  cz TP: šokovaný křičící obličej
  EN FP: shocked by the phone bill
  cz FP: šokovaný z účtu za telefon
1922 | study (verb): to learn about a subject by reading | loc: studovat
  EN TS: Studying gives her a headache.
  cz TS: Ze studování ji bolí hlava.
  EN FS: Cooking gives her a headache.
  cz FS: Z vaření ji bolí hlava.
  EN TP: studying a huge book
  cz TP: studuje obří knihu
  EN FP: studying in the garden
  cz FP: studuje na zahradě
1923 | bookshelf (noun): shelves where books stand side by side | loc: police na knihy
  EN TS: The bookshelves are packed!
  cz TS: Police na knihy jsou narvané!
  EN FS: The bookshelves are empty!
  cz FS: Police na knihy jsou prázdné!
  EN TP: tall bookshelves full of books
  cz TP: vysoké plné police na knihy
  EN FP: an empty bookshelf
  cz FP: prázdná police na knihy
1924 | vivid (adjective): very bright and intense in colour | loc: zářivý
  EN TS: So many vivid colours!
  cz TS: Tolik zářivých barev!
  EN FS: So many dull colours!
  cz FS: Tolik mdlých barev!
  EN TP: vivid swirls of colour
  cz TP: zářivé víry barev
  EN FP: a vivid dream
  cz FP: živý sen
1926 | teeth (noun): the hard white things in your mouth for biting | loc: zuby
  EN TS: The skull has all its teeth!
  cz TS: Lebka má všechny zuby!
  EN FS: The skull has no teeth!
  cz FS: Lebka nemá žádné zuby!
  EN TP: a skull's grinning teeth
  cz TP: vyceněné zuby lebky
  EN FP: a dog's sharp teeth
  cz FP: ostré psí zuby
1927 | roots (noun): the parts of a plant that grow underground | loc: kořeny
  EN TS: Golden roots? Not a cheap tree.
  cz TS: Zlaté kořeny? Levný strom to nebude.
  EN FS: Golden leaves? Not a cheap tree.
  cz FS: Zlaté listy? Levný strom to nebude.
  EN TP: golden roots with jewels
  cz TP: zlaté kořeny s drahokamy
  EN FP: golden leaves with jewels
  cz FP: zlaté listy s drahokamy
1928 | downtown (noun): the busy central business area of a city | loc: centrum města
  EN TS: Downtown glows red. So cool.
  cz TS: Centrum města září červeně. Pecka.
  EN FS: Downtown glows green. So cool.
  cz FS: Centrum města září zeleně. Pecka.
  EN TP: a neon downtown street
  cz TP: neonová ulice v centru města
  EN FP: a quiet downtown morning
  cz FP: klidné ráno v centru města
1930 | medieval (adjective): from the age of castles and stone towns | loc: středověký
  EN TS: The medieval town looks cosy.
  cz TS: Středověké městečko vypadá útulně.
  EN FS: The modern city looks cosy.
  cz FS: Moderní město vypadá útulně.
  EN TP: a medieval stone town
  cz TP: středověké kamenné městečko
  EN FP: a medieval market day
  cz FP: středověký jarmark
1931 | rainy (adjective): with a lot of water falling from the clouds | loc: deštivý
  EN TS: A rainy city street.
  cz TS: Deštivá ulice ve městě.
  EN FS: A sunny city street.
  cz FS: Slunečná ulice ve městě.
  EN TP: a rainy street
  cz TP: deštivá ulice
  EN FP: a rainy beach
  cz FP: deštivá pláž
1932 | computer (noun): an electronic machine for work, games and the web | loc: počítač
  EN TS: The computer is on a red desk.
  cz TS: Počítač je na červeném stole.
  EN FS: The computer is on a red sofa.
  cz FS: Počítač je na červené pohovce.
  EN TP: a computer on a desk
  cz TP: počítač na stole
  EN FP: a computer on a lap
  cz FP: počítač na klíně
1933 | spirit (noun): a magical being of nature, not fully human | loc: duch
  EN TS: She is a tree spirit.
  cz TS: Je duchem stromu.
  EN FS: She is a water spirit.
  cz FS: Je duchem vody.
  EN TP: an old tree spirit
  cz TP: starý duch stromu
  EN FP: a spirit of the ocean
  cz FP: duch oceánu
1934 | surreal (adjective): strange and dream-like, against real rules | loc: surreální
  EN TS: These shelves are surreal.
  cz TS: Tyhle police jsou surreální.
  EN FS: These shelves are ordinary.
  cz FS: Tyhle police jsou obyčejné.
  EN TP: surreal bending bookshelves
  cz TP: surreální prohnuté knihovny
  EN FP: a surreal melting clock
  cz FP: surreální tekoucí hodiny
1935 | new york (noun): the biggest city in the United States | loc: New York
  EN TS: It is sunset in New York.
  cz TS: V New Yorku zapadá slunce.
  EN FS: It is night in New York.
  cz FS: V New Yorku je noc.
  EN TP: New York at sunset
  cz TP: New York při západu slunce
  EN FP: New York at night
  cz FP: New York v noci
1936 | flower crown (noun): a ring of blossoms you wear on your head | loc: květinový věnec
  EN TS: Her flower crown is huge!
  cz TS: Její květinový věnec je obří!
  EN FS: Her feather crown is huge!
  cz FS: Její věnec z peří je obří!
  EN TP: wearing a flower crown
  cz TP: nosí květinový věnec
  EN FP: making a flower crown
  cz FP: plete květinový věnec
1937 | hacker (noun): a person who breaks into computers and code | loc: hacker
  EN TS: The hacker is wearing a hood.
  cz TS: Hacker má kapuci.
  EN FS: The hacker is wearing a cap.
  cz FS: Hacker má kšiltovku.
  EN TP: a hooded hacker
  cz TP: hacker v kapuci
  EN FP: a hacker in the park
  cz FP: hacker v parku
1938 | coast (noun): the land right along the edge of the sea | loc: pobřeží
  EN TS: A lone whale off the coast.
  cz TS: Osamělá velryba u pobřeží.
  EN FS: A lone shark off the coast.
  cz FS: Osamělý žralok u pobřeží.
  EN TP: a sandy coast from above
  cz TP: písečné pobřeží z výšky
  EN FP: a rocky coast with cliffs
  cz FP: skalnaté pobřeží s útesy
1940 | dandelion (noun): a wild yellow flower that turns into a puffball | loc: pampeliška
  EN TS: Dandelions surround her head.
  cz TS: Pampelišky jí obklopují hlavu.
  EN FS: Roses surround her head.
  cz FS: Růže jí obklopují hlavu.
  EN TP: white dandelion puffs
  cz TP: bílé chmýří pampelišek
  EN FP: blowing a dandelion
  cz FP: foukání do pampelišky
1941 | pirate (noun): a sea robber who attacks ships | loc: pirát
  EN TS: This pirate mouse looks like Jack Sparrow.
  cz TS: Tahle myš pirát vypadá jak Jack Sparrow.
  EN FS: This pirate cat looks like Jack Sparrow.
  cz FS: Tahle kočka pirát vypadá jak Jack Sparrow.
  EN TP: a pirate mouse
  cz TP: myš pirát
  EN FP: a pirate ship
  cz FP: pirátská loď
1943 | gnome (noun): a tiny fairy-tale creature in a pointed hat | loc: skřítek
  EN TS: The gnome's hat is green. Wow.
  cz TS: Skřítek má zelenou čepici. Páni.
  EN FS: The gnome's hat is red. Wow.
  cz FS: Skřítek má červenou čepici. Páni.
  EN TP: a gnome in green
  cz TP: skřítek v zeleném
  EN FP: a gnome in red
  cz FP: skřítek v červeném
1944 | ribs (noun): the curved bones around your chest | loc: žebra
  EN TS: Fact: you can see its ribs.
  cz TS: Fakt: jsou mu vidět žebra.
  EN FS: Fact: you can see its heart.
  cz FS: Fakt: je mu vidět srdce.
  EN TP: a cage of ribs
  cz TP: klec z žeber
  EN FP: ribs on a grill
  cz FP: žebra na grilu
1945 | spooky (adjective): strange and frightening, like a ghost place | loc: strašidelný
  EN TS: What a spooky castle!
  cz TS: Jaký strašidelný hrad!
  EN FS: What a spooky church!
  cz FS: Jaký strašidelný kostel!
  EN TP: a spooky castle on rocks
  cz TP: strašidelný hrad na skalách
  EN FP: a spooky castle in snow
  cz FP: strašidelný hrad ve sněhu
1946 | cool (adjective): stylish and relaxed in a way people admire | loc: stylový
  EN TS: This cat is too cool.
  cz TS: Tahle kočka je až moc stylová.
  EN FS: This dog is too cool.
  cz FS: Tenhle pes je až moc stylový.
  EN TP: a cool cat in sunglasses
  cz TP: stylová kočka ve slunečních brýlích
  EN FP: a cool summer drink
  cz FP: osvěžující letní drink
1947 | mane (noun): the long thick hair round a lion's neck | loc: hříva
  EN TS: Just a normal rainbow mane.
  cz TS: Jen normální duhová hříva.
  EN FS: Just a normal black mane.
  cz FS: Jen normální černá hříva.
  EN TP: a rainbow mane
  cz TP: duhová hříva
  EN FP: a rainbow over a lion
  cz FP: duha nad lvem
1948 | wavy (adjective): forming soft curves instead of lying straight | loc: vlnitý
  EN TS: Her wavy hair is everywhere!
  cz TS: Její vlnité vlasy jsou všude!
  EN FS: Her short hair is everywhere!
  cz FS: Její krátké vlasy jsou všude!
  EN TP: wavy hair full of leaves
  cz TP: vlnité vlasy plné listí
  EN FP: wavy hair full of flowers
  cz FP: vlnité vlasy plné květin
1949 | enchanted (adjective): under a magic spell | loc: začarovaný
  EN TS: This forest is so enchanted.
  cz TS: Tenhle les je fakt začarovaný.
  EN FS: This forest is so burnt.
  cz FS: Tenhle les je fakt spálený.
  EN TP: an enchanted forest path
  cz TP: cesta začarovaným lesem
  EN FP: an enchanted castle
  cz FP: začarovaný hrad
1950 | evil (adjective): deeply bad and cruel | loc: zlý | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: This evil tower needs a lift.
  cz TS: Tahle zlá věž by potřebovala výtah.
  EN FS: This evil church needs a lift.
  cz FS: Tenhle zlý kostel by potřeboval výtah.
  EN TP: an evil fortress
  cz TP: zlá pevnost
  EN FP: an evil stepmother
  cz FP: zlá macecha
1951 | armchair (noun): a big soft chair with supports for your arms | loc: křeslo
  EN TS: An armchair awaits a reader.
  cz TS: Křeslo čeká na čtenáře.
  EN FS: A sofa awaits a reader.
  cz FS: Pohovka čeká na čtenáře.
  EN TP: a worn leather armchair
  cz TP: ošoupané kožené křeslo
  EN FP: a new plastic armchair
  cz FP: nové plastové křeslo
1952 | full moon (noun): the whole bright round disc seen in the night sky | loc: úplněk
  EN TS: A full moon behind one tree.
  cz TS: Úplněk za jedním stromem.
  EN FS: A full moon behind two trees.
  cz FS: Úplněk za dvěma stromy.
  EN TP: full moon behind a tree
  cz TP: úplněk za stromem
  EN FP: full moon over the sea
  cz FP: úplněk nad mořem
1953 | snowflake (noun): a single small ice crystal that falls as snow | loc: sněhová vločka
  EN TS: Snowflake crown? Queen vibes.
  cz TS: Koruna ze sněhových vloček? Královna.
  EN FS: Flower crown? Queen vibes.
  cz FS: Koruna z květin? Královna.
  EN TP: a crown of snowflakes
  cz TP: koruna ze sněhových vloček
  EN FP: snowflakes on a window
  cz FP: sněhové vločky na okně
1955 | fairy tale (noun): a magical story world with witches and elves | loc: pohádka
  EN TS: OMG, it's a fairy tale house.
  cz TS: Ty jo, to je domeček jak z pohádky.
  EN FS: OMG, it's a fairy tale boat.
  cz FS: Ty jo, to je loďka jak z pohádky.
  EN TP: a fairy tale cottage
  cz TP: chaloupka jak z pohádky
  EN FP: a fairy tale castle
  cz FP: zámek jak z pohádky
1957 | cobblestones (noun): the round stones that pave old streets | loc: dlažební kostky
  EN TS: The cobblestones are wet.
  cz TS: Dlažební kostky jsou mokré.
  EN FS: The cobblestones are snowy.
  cz FS: Dlažební kostky jsou zasněžené.
  EN TP: wet cobblestones at night
  cz TP: mokré dlažební kostky v noci
  EN FP: cobblestones on a beach
  cz FP: dlažební kostky na pláži
1958 | stairs (noun): a flight of steps | loc: schody
  EN TS: Stone stairs and pink flowers.
  cz TS: Kamenné schody a růžové květy.
  EN FS: Stone stairs and red flowers.
  cz FS: Kamenné schody a červené květy.
  EN TP: stone stairs in a village
  cz TP: kamenné schody ve vesnici
  EN FP: stone stairs in a castle
  cz FP: kamenné schody na hradě
1959 | braid (noun): hair woven into one plaited strand | loc: cop
  EN TS: Her braid reaches her waist.
  cz TS: Cop jí sahá do pasu.
  EN FS: Her braid reaches her knees.
  cz FS: Cop jí sahá ke kolenům.
  EN TP: a waist-long braid
  cz TP: cop až do pasu
  EN FP: a short braid
  cz FP: krátký cop
1960 | samurai (noun): a Japanese warrior who fights with a sword | loc: samuraj
  EN TS: She's walking like a real samurai.
  cz TS: Kráčí jako pravý samuraj.
  EN FS: She's dancing like a real samurai.
  cz FS: Tančí jako pravý samuraj.
  EN TP: a samurai with a sword
  cz TP: samuraj s mečem
  EN FP: a samurai with a bow
  cz FP: samuraj s lukem
1961 | bone (noun): the rigid tissue that makes up the skeleton | loc: kost
  EN TS: These bones love a good book.
  cz TS: Tyhle kosti milují dobrou knížku.
  EN FS: These bones love a good film.
  cz FS: Tyhle kosti milují dobrý film.
  EN TP: bones over an open book
  cz TP: kosti nad otevřenou knihou
  EN FP: a dog with a bone
  cz FP: pes s kostí
1962 | fortress (noun): a large strong building made to defend | loc: pevnost
  EN TS: This fortress looks scary!
  cz TS: Tahle pevnost vypadá děsivě!
  EN FS: This cottage looks scary!
  cz FS: Tahle chalupa vypadá děsivě!
  EN TP: a dark hilltop fortress
  cz TP: temná pevnost na kopci
  EN FP: a fortress in the desert
  cz FP: pevnost v poušti
1964 | haunted (adjective): believed to have ghosts living inside | loc: strašidelný
  EN TS: The house must be haunted.
  cz TS: Ten dům musí být strašidelný.
  EN FS: The school must be haunted.
  cz FS: Ta škola musí být strašidelná.
  EN TP: a haunted old house
  cz TP: strašidelný starý dům
  EN FP: a haunted old ship
  cz FP: strašidelná stará loď
1965 | cabin (noun): a small simple wooden house | loc: chata
  EN TS: Cosy cabin. A bit of snow.
  cz TS: Útulná chata. Trochu sněhu.
  EN FS: Cosy cabin. A bit of sand.
  cz FS: Útulná chata. Trochu písku.
  EN TP: a snowy wooden cabin
  cz TP: zasněžená dřevěná chata
  EN FP: a cabin on a ship
  cz FP: kajuta na lodi
1966 | path (noun): a narrow marked way that you walk along | loc: pěšina
  EN TS: The path is made of stones.
  cz TS: Pěšina je z kamenů.
  EN FS: The path is made of wood.
  cz FS: Pěšina je ze dřeva.
  EN TP: a cobblestone path
  cz TP: dlážděná pěšina
  EN FP: a forest path
  cz FP: lesní pěšina
1967 | cute (adjective): small and sweet in a way that makes you smile | loc: roztomilý
  EN TS: The baby fox is so cute!
  cz TS: Liščí mládě je tak roztomilé!
  EN FS: The baby bear is so cute!
  cz FS: Medvídě je tak roztomilé!
  EN TP: a cute baby fox
  cz TP: roztomilé liščátko
  EN FP: a cute baby bird
  cz FP: roztomilé ptáče
1968 | raven (noun): a large black bird like a big crow | loc: krkavec
  EN TS: I think those are ravens.
  cz TS: Myslím, že to jsou krkavci.
  EN FS: I think those are parrots.
  cz FS: Myslím, že to jsou papoušci.
  EN TP: ravens flying around her
  cz TP: krkavci létají kolem ní
  EN FP: ravens sitting on her arm
  cz FP: krkavci jí sedí na ruce
1969 | bouquet (noun): a bunch of flowers arranged together | loc: kytice
  EN TS: A bouquet from space? Romantic!
  cz TS: Kytice z vesmíru? Romantika!
  EN FS: A bouquet from the sea? Romantic!
  cz FS: Kytice z moře? Romantika!
  EN TP: gathering a bouquet
  cz TP: skládá kytici
  EN FP: throwing a bouquet
  cz FP: hází kytici
1970 | hut (noun): a small simple building | loc: chýše
  EN TS: The hut has one plank door. Basic, but solid.
  cz TS: Chýše má jedny prkenné dveře. Základní, ale pevné.
  EN FS: The hut has one glass door. Basic, but solid.
  cz FS: Chýše má jedny skleněné dveře. Základní, ale pevné.
  EN TP: a tiny snowy hut
  cz TP: malinká zasněžená chýše
  EN FP: a tiny beach hut
  cz FP: malinká plážová chýše
1971 | peak (noun): the pointed top of a mountain | loc: vrchol
  EN TS: Peaks over clouds. Unreal.
  cz TS: Vrcholy nad mraky. Neskutečné.
  EN FS: Peaks under clouds. Unreal.
  cz FS: Vrcholy pod mraky. Neskutečné.
  EN TP: snowy peaks above the clouds
  cz TP: zasněžené vrcholy nad mraky
  EN FP: peaks covered in forest
  cz FP: vrcholy porostlé lesem
1972 | turban (noun): a long cloth wound around the head | loc: turban
  EN TS: That turban is a whole tower!
  cz TS: Ten turban je celá věž!
  EN FS: That crown is a whole tower!
  cz FS: Ta koruna je celá věž!
  EN TP: a tall jeweled turban
  cz TP: vysoký turban s drahokamy
  EN FP: a turban in the desert
  cz FP: turban v poušti
1973 | goddess (noun): a female god | loc: bohyně
  EN TS: This goddess looks Egyptian.
  cz TS: Tahle bohyně vypadá egyptsky.
  EN FS: This goddess looks Japanese.
  cz FS: Tahle bohyně vypadá japonsky.
  EN TP: a goddess with golden wings
  cz TP: bohyně se zlatými křídly
  EN FP: a goddess with a bow
  cz FP: bohyně s lukem
1974 | ballerina (noun): a girl who dances ballet on her toes | loc: baletka
  EN TS: The ballerina is on her toes.
  cz TS: Baletka je na špičkách.
  EN FS: The ballerina is on her knees.
  cz FS: Baletka je na kolenou.
  EN TP: a ballerina in a tutu
  cz TP: baletka v tylové sukýnce
  EN FP: a ballerina shoe
  cz FP: baletní špička
1976 | skate (verb): to glide over ice wearing ice skates | loc: bruslit
  EN TS: Four kids are skating while squirrels judge them.
  cz TS: Čtyři děti bruslí a veverky je hodnotí.
  EN FS: Four kids are skating while dogs judge them.
  cz FS: Čtyři děti bruslí a psi je hodnotí.
  EN TP: skating on a frozen pond
  cz TP: bruslení na zamrzlém rybníku
  EN FP: skating on a half-pipe
  cz FP: bruslení v U-rampě
1977 | creepy (adjective): making you feel nervous and a bit scared | loc: děsivý
  EN TS: The bats make it extra creepy!
  cz TS: Kvůli netopýrům je to extra děsivé!
  EN FS: The owls make it extra creepy!
  cz FS: Kvůli sovám je to extra děsivé!
  EN TP: a creepy ruined house
  cz TP: děsivý rozpadlý dům
  EN FP: a creepy old doll
  cz FP: děsivá stará panenka
1979 | dye (verb): to change the colour of hair or cloth | loc: barvit
  EN TS: She dyed it purple. Bold!
  cz TS: Nabarvila si je nafialovo. Odvážné!
  EN FS: She dyed it green. Bold!
  cz FS: Nabarvila si je nazeleno. Odvážné!
  EN TP: hair dyed bright purple
  cz TP: vlasy nabarvené zářivě fialově
  EN FP: hair dyed bright green
  cz FP: vlasy nabarvené zářivě zeleně
1980 | pine (noun): a tall evergreen tree with needles | loc: borovice
  EN TS: Evergreen pines surround the hut.
  cz TS: Chýši obklopují stálezelené borovice.
  EN FS: Evergreen palms surround the hut.
  cz FS: Chýši obklopují stálezelené palmy.
  EN TP: snowy pine trees
  cz TP: zasněžené borovice
  EN FP: a pine table
  cz FP: borovicový stůl
1981 | crash (verb): to hit something hard with a loud noise | loc: narážet
  EN TS: Waves are crashing into the lighthouse!
  cz TS: Vlny narážejí do majáku!
  EN FS: Waves are crashing into the harbour!
  cz FS: Vlny narážejí do přístavu!
  EN TP: waves crashing on rocks
  cz TP: vlny narážejí na skály
  EN FP: crashing on a friend's sofa
  cz FP: přespávání u kámoše na gauči
1982 | cluttered (adjective): untidily full of far too many things | loc: přeplněný
  EN TS: The room is "a bit" cluttered.
  cz TS: Pokoj je „trochu“ přeplněný.
  EN FS: The room is "a bit" empty.
  cz FS: Pokoj je „trochu“ prázdný.
  EN TP: cluttered shelves
  cz TP: přeplněné police
  EN FP: a cluttered desk
  cz FP: přeplněný stůl
1983 | eyelashes (noun): the small hairs on the edge of the eyelids | loc: řasy
  EN TS: Her eyelashes are very long.
  cz TS: Její řasy jsou hodně dlouhé.
  EN FS: Her eyelashes are very short.
  cz FS: Její řasy jsou hodně krátké.
  EN TP: long dark eyelashes
  cz TP: dlouhé tmavé řasy
  EN FP: fake eyelashes in a box
  cz FP: umělé řasy v krabičce
1984 | pale (adjective): very light, almost white in colour | loc: bledý
  EN TS: Her face is very pale.
  cz TS: Její obličej je velmi bledý.
  EN FS: Her face is very dark.
  cz FS: Její obličej je velmi tmavý.
  EN TP: a pale white face
  cz TP: bledý bílý obličej
  EN FP: a pale blue sky
  cz FP: bledě modrá obloha
1985 | bright (adjective): strong and full of color, easy to see | loc: zářivý
  EN TS: The tree is bright red!
  cz TS: Strom má zářivou červenou barvu!
  EN FS: The tree is bright green!
  cz FS: Strom má zářivou zelenou barvu!
  EN TP: bright red leaves
  cz TP: zářivé červené listí
  EN FP: bright red apples
  cz FP: zářivá červená jablka
1986 | bare (adjective): not covered — no leaves, no clothes | loc: holý
  EN TS: The tree is bare. So sad.
  cz TS: Strom je holý. Smutné.
  EN FS: The tree is green. So sad.
  cz FS: Strom je zelený. Smutné.
  EN TP: a bare tree at night
  cz TP: holý strom v noci
  EN FP: bare feet in the grass
  cz FP: bosé nohy v trávě
1987 | future (phrase): the time that will come after now | loc: budoucnost
  EN TS: This city is from the future.
  cz TS: Tohle město je z budoucnosti.
  EN FS: This city is from the past.
  cz FS: Tohle město je z minulosti.
  EN TP: a city of the future
  cz TP: město budoucnosti
  EN FP: a city of the past
  cz FP: město minulosti
1988 | fence (noun): a barrier that goes around an area | loc: plot
  EN TS: The fence has sharp spikes.
  cz TS: Plot má ostré hroty.
  EN FS: The fence has no gate.
  cz FS: Plot nemá bránu.
  EN TP: a spiked iron fence
  cz TP: železný plot s hroty
  EN FP: a wooden garden fence
  cz FP: dřevěný zahradní plot
1989 | potion (noun): a magic drink made for a special effect | loc: lektvar
  EN TS: Old potions fill the shelves.
  cz TS: Police jsou plné starých lektvarů.
  EN FS: Old shoes fill the shelves.
  cz FS: Police jsou plné starých bot.
  EN TP: shelves of old potions
  cz TP: police se starými lektvary
  EN FP: a potion in a cauldron
  cz FP: lektvar v kotli
1990 | comfortable (adjective): giving a feeling of physical well-being | loc: pohodlný
  EN TS: A super comfortable armchair.
  cz TS: Super pohodlné křeslo.
  EN FS: A super comfortable sofa.
  cz FS: Super pohodlná pohovka.
  EN TP: a comfortable golden armchair
  cz TP: pohodlné zlaté křeslo
  EN FP: a comfortable golden bed
  cz FP: pohodlná zlatá postel
1991 | type (verb): to write using a keyboard | loc: psát na klávesnici
  EN TS: He is typing like a machine!
  cz TS: Píše na klávesnici jak stroj!
  EN FS: He is painting like a machine!
  cz FS: Maluje jak stroj!
  EN TP: typing on a keyboard
  cz TP: psaní na klávesnici
  EN FP: typing on a phone
  cz FP: psaní na mobilu
1992 | listen (verb): to hear something on purpose | loc: poslouchat
  EN TS: She is listening through big green headphones.
  cz TS: Poslouchá přes velká zelená sluchátka.
  EN FS: She is listening through big red headphones.
  cz FS: Poslouchá přes velká červená sluchátka.
  EN TP: listening to music
  cz TP: poslouchá hudbu
  EN FP: listening to a teacher
  cz FP: poslouchá učitele
1994 | on top of (preposition): resting on the highest part of something | loc: na vrchu
  EN TS: A cat is on top of the books.
  cz TS: Kočka je na vrchu hromady knih.
  EN FS: A cat is on top of the hedge.
  cz FS: Kočka je na vrchu živého plotu.
  EN TP: on top of the books
  cz TP: na vrchu knih
  EN FP: on top of the car
  cz FP: na vrchu auta
1995 | doorway (noun): the opening in a wall where a door is | loc: dveřní otvor
  EN TS: This doorway leads to another world.
  cz TS: Tenhle dveřní otvor vede do jiného světa.
  EN FS: This doorway leads to a dark cellar.
  cz FS: Tenhle dveřní otvor vede do temného sklepa.
  EN TP: a glowing arched doorway
  cz TP: zářící klenutý dveřní otvor
  EN FP: a doorway to the kitchen
  cz FP: dveřní otvor do kuchyně
1997 | axe (noun): a tool with a heavy blade for chopping | loc: sekera
  EN TS: That battle axe is huge!
  cz TS: Ta bojová sekera je obří!
  EN FS: That battle shield is huge!
  cz FS: Ten bojový štít je obří!
  EN TP: holding a battle axe
  cz TP: drží bojovou sekeru
  EN FP: holding a battle flag
  cz FP: drží bojovou vlajku
1998 | mansion (noun): a very large and impressive house | loc: vila
  EN TS: Rich people live in this mansion.
  cz TS: V téhle vile bydlí boháči.
  EN FS: Rich people live in this cottage.
  cz FS: V téhle chalupě bydlí boháči.
  EN TP: a mansion at dusk
  cz TP: vila za soumraku
  EN FP: a mansion on the beach
  cz FP: vila na pláži
1999 | fur (noun): the soft thick hair covering an animal | loc: srst
  EN TS: Bro, that fur is so thick.
  cz TS: Kámo, ta srst je fakt hustá.
  EN FS: Bro, that fur is so black.
  cz FS: Kámo, ta srst je fakt černá.
  EN TP: thick white fur
  cz TP: hustá bílá srst
  EN FP: a white fur coat
  cz FP: bílý kožich
2000 | moonlight (noun): the light the moon gives at night | loc: měsíční svit
  EN TS: Moonlight is shining on water.
  cz TS: Na vodě se třpytí měsíční svit.
  EN FS: Sunlight is shining on water.
  cz FS: Na vodě se třpytí sluneční světlo.
  EN TP: moonlight on a marsh
  cz TP: měsíční svit na mokřadu
  EN FP: moonlight in a bedroom
  cz FP: měsíční svit v ložnici
2001 | beak (noun): the hard pointed mouth part of a bird | loc: zobák
  EN TS: The owl has a gold beak. Rich owl!
  cz TS: Sova má zlatý zobák. Bohatá sova!
  EN FS: The owl has a red beak. Rich owl!
  cz FS: Sova má červený zobák. Bohatá sova!
  EN TP: an owl's golden beak
  cz TP: zlatý zobák sovy
  EN FP: an owl's broken beak
  cz FP: zlomený zobák sovy
2002 | whiskers (noun): the long stiff hairs on a cat's face | loc: vousky
  EN TS: The cat has long whiskers.
  cz TS: Kočka má dlouhé vousky.
  EN FS: The cat has short whiskers.
  cz FS: Kočka má krátké vousky.
  EN TP: a cat with long whiskers
  cz TP: kočka s dlouhými vousky
  EN FP: a man with long whiskers
  cz FP: muž s dlouhým knírem
2005 | crow (noun): a big all-black bird with a harsh call | loc: vrána
  EN TS: The crow is waiting for news.
  cz TS: Vrána čeká na zprávy.
  EN FS: The owl is waiting for news.
  cz FS: Sova čeká na zprávy.
  EN TP: a crow on a branch
  cz TP: vrána na větvi
  EN FP: a crow on a scarecrow
  cz FP: vrána na strašákovi
2008 | trunk (noun): the thick wooden stem of a tree | loc: kmen
  EN TS: The trunk is huge and twisted.
  cz TS: Kmen je obrovský a pokroucený.
  EN FS: The trunk is thin and smooth.
  cz FS: Kmen je tenký a hladký.
  EN TP: a massive twisted trunk
  cz TP: mohutný pokroucený kmen
  EN FP: an elephant's trunk
  cz FP: sloní chobot
2010 | story (noun): a tale about people and events | loc: příběh
  EN TS: The story is coming alive!
  cz TS: Příběh ožívá!
  EN FS: The story is burning!
  cz FS: Příběh hoří!
  EN TP: a story coming alive
  cz TP: ožívající příběh
  EN FP: a story about a city
  cz FP: příběh o městě
2011 | open (adjective): not closed, so you can go or see through | loc: otevřený
  EN TS: The door is wide open.
  cz TS: Dveře jsou otevřené dokořán.
  EN FS: The door is closed.
  cz FS: Dveře jsou zavřené.
  EN TP: an open glass door
  cz TP: otevřené skleněné dveře
  EN FP: an open laptop
  cz FP: otevřený notebook
2012 | entrance (noun): something that gives you a way to get in | loc: vchod
  EN TS: Flowers cover the entrance.
  cz TS: Vchod zakrývají květiny.
  EN FS: Snow covers the entrance.
  cz FS: Vchod zakrývá sníh.
  EN TP: a garden entrance with flowers
  cz TP: vchod do zahrady s květinami
  EN FP: a hotel entrance with flowers
  cz FP: vchod do hotelu s květinami
2013 | gothic (adjective): in a dark dramatic style with black clothes | loc: gotický
  EN TS: Her makeup? Totally gothic.
  cz TS: Její make-up? Totálně gotický.
  EN FS: Her makeup? Totally pink.
  cz FS: Její make-up? Totálně růžový.
  EN TP: a gothic look
  cz TP: gotický styl
  EN FP: a gothic church
  cz FP: gotický kostel
2014 | dusk (noun): the fading light just before night | loc: soumrak
  EN TS: Alone at dusk. So mysterious.
  cz TS: Samota za soumraku. Tak tajemné.
  EN FS: Alone at noon. So mysterious.
  cz FS: Samota v poledne. Tak tajemné.
  EN TP: an old lane at dusk
  cz TP: stará ulička za soumraku
  EN FP: dusk on an empty beach
  cz FP: soumrak na prázdné pláži
2015 | monument (noun): a big old structure built to be remembered | loc: památník
  EN TS: Fact: the monument is stone.
  cz TS: Fakt: památník je z kamene.
  EN FS: Fact: the monument is wood.
  cz FS: Fakt: památník je ze dřeva.
  EN TP: an old stone monument
  cz TP: starý kamenný památník
  EN FP: a monument in a square
  cz FP: památník na náměstí
2016 | wand (noun): a thin stick used to cast magic spells | loc: kouzelná hůlka
  EN TS: Harry Potter needs this wand, bro.
  cz TS: Harry Potter potřebuje tuhle kouzelnou hůlku, kámo.
  EN FS: Harry Potter needs this broom, bro.
  cz FS: Harry Potter potřebuje tohle koště, kámo.
  EN TP: a glowing magic wand
  cz TP: zářící kouzelná hůlka
  EN FP: a broken magic wand
  cz FP: zlomená kouzelná hůlka
2019 | locomotive (noun): the engine at the front that pulls a train | loc: lokomotiva
  EN TS: The locomotive runs on steam.
  cz TS: Lokomotiva jezdí na páru.
  EN FS: The locomotive runs on diesel.
  cz FS: Lokomotiva jezdí na naftu.
  EN TP: an old steam locomotive
  cz TP: stará parní lokomotiva
  EN FP: an old diesel locomotive
  cz FP: stará dieselová lokomotiva
2021 | constellation (noun): a group of stars that forms a pattern | loc: souhvězdí
  EN TS: Constellations fill the sky.
  cz TS: Oblohu plní souhvězdí.
  EN FS: Rainbows fill the sky.
  cz FS: Oblohu plní duhy.
  EN TP: constellations above the house
  cz TP: souhvězdí nad domem
  EN FP: constellations on a map
  cz FP: souhvězdí na mapě
2023 | gift (noun): something you are given for free | loc: dárek
  EN TS: Gifts were left in the snow!
  cz TS: Někdo nechal dárky ve sněhu!
  EN FS: Skis were left in the snow!
  cz FS: Někdo nechal lyže ve sněhu!
  EN TP: gift boxes in the snow
  cz TP: krabice s dárky ve sněhu
  EN FP: gift boxes under a bed
  cz FP: krabice s dárky pod postelí
2024 | neon (adjective): glowing in bright electric colours | loc: neonový
  EN TS: Neon signs everywhere!
  cz TS: Všude neonové nápisy!
  EN FS: Paper signs everywhere!
  cz FS: Všude papírové nápisy!
  EN TP: pink and green neon signs
  cz TP: růžové a zelené neonové nápisy
  EN FP: a neon green jacket
  cz FP: neonově zelená bunda
2025 | futuristic (adjective): looking modern, high-tech and from the future | loc: futuristický
  EN TS: Futuristic city, year 3000?
  cz TS: Futuristické město, rok 3000?
  EN FS: Futuristic village, year 3000?
  cz FS: Futuristická vesnice, rok 3000?
  EN TP: futuristic towers at night
  cz TP: futuristické věže v noci
  EN FP: a futuristic flying car
  cz FP: futuristické létající auto
2026 | study (noun): a room at home used for reading and working | loc: pracovna
  EN TS: What a dreamy study!
  cz TS: Jaká snová pracovna!
  EN FS: What a dreamy kitchen!
  cz FS: Jaká snová kuchyně!
  EN TP: a study full of flowers
  cz TP: pracovna plná květin
  EN FP: a study full of students
  cz FP: pracovna plná studentů
2028 | jug (noun): a container with a handle for holding liquid | loc: džbán
  EN TS: A white jug sits among books.
  cz TS: Mezi knihami je bílý džbán.
  EN FS: A white cat sits among books.
  cz FS: Mezi knihami je bílá kočka.
  EN TP: a jug on a bookshelf
  cz TP: džbán v knihovně
  EN FP: a jug on a table
  cz FP: džbán na stole
2029 | trail (noun): a rough path through the countryside | loc: stezka
  EN TS: The trail vanishes in the fog.
  cz TS: Stezka mizí v mlze.
  EN FS: The trail vanishes in the sea.
  cz FS: Stezka mizí v moři.
  EN TP: a stony mountain trail
  cz TP: kamenitá horská stezka
  EN FP: a trail of footprints
  cz FP: stezka ze stop
2031 | twig (noun): a very small thin branch of a tree | loc: větvička
  EN TS: Her hair has twigs. Weird.
  cz TS: Má ve vlasech větvičky. Divné.
  EN FS: Her hair has flowers. Weird.
  cz FS: Má ve vlasech květiny. Divné.
  EN TP: twigs in her hair
  cz TP: větvičky ve vlasech
  EN FP: a nest of twigs
  cz FP: hnízdo z větviček
2032 | portal (noun): a gateway that leads into another world | loc: portál
  EN TS: A portal to a golden city.
  cz TS: Portál do zlatého města.
  EN FS: A portal to a dark forest.
  cz FS: Portál do temného lesa.
  EN TP: a glowing round portal
  cz TP: zářící kulatý portál
  EN FP: a portal under the sea
  cz FP: portál pod mořem
2033 | whirlpool (noun): water that spins round and pulls things down | loc: vír
  EN TS: The guitar is in a whirlpool!
  cz TS: Kytara je ve víru!
  EN FS: The guitar is in a desert!
  cz FS: Kytara je v poušti!
  EN TP: a guitar in a whirlpool
  cz TP: kytara ve víru
  EN FP: a boat in a whirlpool
  cz FP: loďka ve víru
2034 | poppy (noun): a wild flower with thin red petals | loc: mák
  EN TS: This poppy is red. Very red.
  cz TS: Tenhle mák je červený. Hodně červený.
  EN FS: This poppy is blue. Very blue.
  cz FS: Tenhle mák je modrý. Hodně modrý.
  EN TP: a red poppy bloom
  cz TP: červený květ máku
  EN FP: a field of poppies
  cz FP: pole máku
2035 | romance (noun): a loving relationship between two people | loc: romance
  EN TS: This romance has a pink heart.
  cz TS: Tahle romance má růžové srdce.
  EN FS: This romance has a red heart.
  cz FS: Tahle romance má červené srdce.
  EN TP: a romance in spring
  cz TP: jarní romance
  EN FP: a romance novel
  cz FP: romantický román
2036 | spear (noun): a long pole weapon with a sharp tip | loc: kopí
  EN TS: Spear supply is clearly not a problem.
  cz TS: S dodávkami kopí zjevně problém není.
  EN FS: Sword supply is clearly not a problem.
  cz FS: S dodávkami mečů zjevně problém není.
  EN TP: an army raising spears
  cz TP: armáda zvedá kopí
  EN FP: an army throwing spears
  cz FP: armáda hází kopí
2037 | creature (noun): a living being, especially a strange one | loc: stvoření
  EN TS: A creature with dark wings.
  cz TS: Stvoření s tmavými křídly.
  EN FS: A creature with long horns.
  cz FS: Stvoření s dlouhými rohy.
  EN TP: a dark winged creature
  cz TP: temné okřídlené stvoření
  EN FP: a creature in the sea
  cz FP: stvoření v moři
2038 | afraid (adjective): filled with fear | loc: vystrašená
  EN TS: She is afraid, and the birds know it.
  cz TS: Je vystrašená a ptáci to vědí.
  EN FS: She is afraid, and the wolves know it.
  cz FS: Je vystrašená a vlci to vědí.
  EN TP: afraid in a dark forest
  cz TP: vystrašená v temném lese
  EN FP: afraid of a big dog
  cz FP: vystrašená z velkého psa
2040 | decoration (noun): a pretty thing that makes a place look festive | loc: ozdoba
  EN TS: Decorations are on every roof.
  cz TS: Na každé střeše jsou ozdoby.
  EN FS: Snowmen are on every roof.
  cz FS: Na každé střeše jsou sněhuláci.
  EN TP: decorations on the roofs
  cz TP: ozdoby na střechách
  EN FP: decorations in a box
  cz FP: ozdoby v krabici
2041 | bottle (noun): a plastic or glass container for liquids | loc: láhev
  EN TS: A whole sunset lives in this bottle.
  cz TS: V téhle láhvi žije celý západ slunce.
  EN FS: A whole ocean lives in this bottle.
  cz FS: V téhle láhvi žije celý oceán.
  EN TP: a dark glass bottle
  cz TP: tmavá skleněná láhev
  EN FP: a bottle of red wine
  cz FP: láhev červeného vína
2042 | huge (adjective): unusually great in size | loc: obrovský
  EN TS: That moon is huge!
  cz TS: Ten měsíc je obrovský!
  EN FS: That sun is huge!
  cz FS: To slunce je obrovské!
  EN TP: a huge full moon
  cz TP: obrovský úplněk
  EN FP: a huge old castle
  cz FP: obrovský starý hrad
2045 | tall (adjective): great in height, from the ground up | loc: vysoký
  EN TS: These stones are super tall.
  cz TS: Tyhle kameny jsou super vysoké.
  EN FS: These trees are super tall.
  cz FS: Tyhle stromy jsou super vysoké.
  EN TP: tall standing stones
  cz TP: vysoké stojící kameny
  EN FP: tall trees in a field
  cz FP: vysoké stromy v poli
2046 | snowy (adjective): covered with snow or full of falling snow | loc: zasněžený
  EN TS: A snowy night in the forest. So quiet...
  cz TS: Zasněžená noc v lese. Takové ticho...
  EN FS: A snowy night in the city. So quiet...
  cz FS: Zasněžená noc ve městě. Takové ticho...
  EN TP: a snowy forest at night
  cz TP: zasněžený les v noci
  EN FP: a snowy street at night
  cz FP: zasněžená ulice v noci
2048 | wild (adjective): living in nature, not kept by people | loc: divoký
  EN TS: This wolf is wild!
  cz TS: Tenhle vlk je divoký!
  EN FS: This dog is wild!
  cz FS: Tenhle pes je divoký!
  EN TP: a wild wolf
  cz TP: divoký vlk
  EN FP: a wild party
  cz FP: divoký mejdan
2049 | cozy (adjective): warm, comfortable and inviting | loc: útulný
  EN TS: The reading corner looks cozy.
  cz TS: Čtecí koutek vypadá útulně.
  EN FS: The kitchen corner looks cozy.
  cz FS: Kuchyňský kout vypadá útulně.
  EN TP: a cozy reading corner
  cz TP: útulný čtecí koutek
  EN FP: a cozy wool jumper
  cz FP: útulný vlněný svetr
2052 | mug (noun): a big cup with a handle for hot drinks | loc: hrnek
  EN TS: The mug is on a pile of books.
  cz TS: Hrnek stojí na hromadě knih.
  EN FS: The mug is on a pile of boxes.
  cz FS: Hrnek stojí na hromadě krabic.
  EN TP: a silver mug on books
  cz TP: stříbrný hrnek na knihách
  EN FP: a mug of cold milk
  cz FP: hrnek studeného mléka
2053 | shelf (noun): a flat horizontal surface for holding objects | loc: police
  EN TS: Bottles fill every shelf.
  cz TS: Lahve zaplňují každou polici.
  EN FS: Books fill every shelf.
  cz FS: Knihy zaplňují každou polici.
  EN TP: shelves of old bottles
  cz TP: police se starými lahvemi
  EN FP: shelves of old books
  cz FP: police se starými knihami
2055 | poison (noun): something that harms you if you drink it | loc: jed
  EN TS: The "Rejuvenation" is poison.
  cz TS: To „Omlazení“ je jed.
  EN FS: The "Rejuvenation" is juice.
  cz FS: To „Omlazení“ je džus.
  EN TP: a bottle of poison
  cz TP: láhev jedu
  EN FP: a bottle of wine
  cz FP: láhev vína
2056 | full (adjective): containing as much as is possible | loc: plný
  EN TS: The shelves are full of books.
  cz TS: Police jsou plné knih.
  EN FS: The shelves are full of jars.
  cz FS: Police jsou plné sklenic.
  EN TP: shelves full of old books
  cz TP: police plné starých knih
  EN FP: shelves full of old toys
  cz FP: police plné starých hraček
2057 | chimney (noun): a pipe on a roof that lets smoke out | loc: komín
  EN TS: The chimney is made of stone.
  cz TS: Komín je z kamene.
  EN FS: The chimney is made of metal.
  cz FS: Komín je z kovu.
  EN TP: a stone chimney in snow
  cz TP: kamenný komín ve sněhu
  EN FP: cleaning the chimney
  cz FP: čištění komína
2058 | reach (verb): to move your arm forward to touch something | loc: sáhnout | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: A bear is reaching for a star.
  cz TS: Medvěd sahá po hvězdě.
  EN FS: A bear is reaching for a bird.
  cz FS: Medvěd sahá po ptákovi.
  EN TP: reaching for a star
  cz TP: sahá po hvězdě
  EN FP: reaching for the honey
  cz FP: sahá po medu
2059 | sunlight (noun): the light that comes from the sun | loc: sluneční světlo
  EN TS: Sunlight hits one side only.
  cz TS: Sluneční světlo dopadá jen na jednu stranu.
  EN FS: Moonlight hits one side only.
  cz FS: Měsíční světlo dopadá jen na jednu stranu.
  EN TP: branches in bright sunlight
  cz TP: větve v jasném slunečním světle
  EN FP: sunlight on the water
  cz FP: sluneční světlo na vodě
2060 | skis (noun): a pair of long narrow boards for moving on snow | loc: lyže
  EN TS: Red and yellow skis, so cool.
  cz TS: Červeno-žluté lyže, fakt cool.
  EN FS: Blue and white skis, so cool.
  cz FS: Modro-bílé lyže, fakt cool.
  EN TP: skis standing in the snow
  cz TP: lyže zapíchnuté ve sněhu
  EN FP: skis on a car roof
  cz FP: lyže na střeše auta
2061 | galaxy (noun): a huge group of stars and glowing dust | loc: galaxie
  EN TS: The galaxy is showing off.
  cz TS: Galaxie se předvádí.
  EN FS: The moon is showing off.
  cz FS: Měsíc se předvádí.
  EN TP: a glowing purple galaxy
  cz TP: zářící fialová galaxie
  EN FP: a galaxy on a T-shirt
  cz FP: galaxie na tričku
2062 | balance (verb): to keep something steady so it does not fall | loc: balancovat
  EN TS: Someone balanced these stones.
  cz TS: Někdo tyhle kameny vybalancoval.
  EN FS: Someone balanced these cups.
  cz FS: Někdo tyhle hrnky vybalancoval.
  EN TP: stones balanced in a tower
  cz TP: vybalancovaná věž z kamenů
  EN FP: to balance on one leg
  cz FP: balancovat na jedné noze
2064 | snow globe (noun): a glass ball with a tiny scene and snow inside | loc: sněžítko
  EN TS: The snow globe has a church.
  cz TS: Ve sněžítku je kostel.
  EN FS: The snow globe has a castle.
  cz FS: Ve sněžítku je hrad.
  EN TP: a glowing snow globe
  cz TP: zářící sněžítko
  EN FP: a broken snow globe
  cz FP: rozbité sněžítko
2067 | lamppost (noun): a tall street pole with a light on top | loc: pouliční lampa
  EN TS: One lamppost, lots of snow.
  cz TS: Jedna pouliční lampa, spousta sněhu.
  EN FS: One lamppost, lots of rain.
  cz FS: Jedna pouliční lampa, spousta deště.
  EN TP: a glowing lamppost
  cz TP: zářící pouliční lampa
  EN FP: a dog by a lamppost
  cz FP: pes u pouliční lampy
2068 | door (noun): the opening in a wall you enter or leave through | loc: dveře
  EN TS: The red door is open.
  cz TS: Červené dveře jsou otevřené.
  EN FS: The blue door is open.
  cz FS: Modré dveře jsou otevřené.
  EN TP: an open red door
  cz TP: otevřené červené dveře
  EN FP: a red garage door
  cz FP: červená vrata od garáže
2069 | reindeer (noun): a large deer with antlers from the cold north | loc: sob
  EN TS: The reindeer had a bad flight.
  cz TS: Sob měl špatný let.
  EN FS: The reindeer had a fun flight.
  cz FS: Sob měl zábavný let.
  EN TP: reindeer stuck on a turbine
  cz TP: sob uvízlý na větrné turbíně
  EN FP: reindeer pulling a sleigh
  cz FP: sob táhne saně
2070 | electric guitar (noun): a guitar that needs an amplifier to be heard | loc: elektrická kytara
  EN TS: The electric guitar is a rocket!
  cz TS: Elektrická kytara je raketa!
  EN FS: The electric guitar is sinking!
  cz FS: Elektrická kytara se potápí!
  EN TP: an electric guitar taking off
  cz TP: elektrická kytara vzlétá
  EN FP: an electric guitar on stage
  cz FP: elektrická kytara na pódiu
2071 | vintage (adjective): old but classic and high quality | loc: vintage
  EN TS: Nice vintage car, so festive.
  cz TS: Pěkné vintage auto, tak sváteční.
  EN FS: Nice vintage van, so festive.
  cz FS: Pěkná vintage dodávka, tak sváteční.
  EN TP: a vintage red car
  cz TP: červené vintage auto
  EN FP: a vintage red dress
  cz FP: červené vintage šaty
2072 | cable (noun): a thick wire that carries power or data | loc: kabel
  EN TS: Cables cover the whole room!
  cz TS: Kabely pokrývají celou místnost!
  EN FS: Plants cover the whole room!
  cz FS: Rostliny pokrývají celou místnost!
  EN TP: glowing blue cables
  cz TP: zářící modré kabely
  EN FP: cables on a bridge
  cz FP: kabely na mostě
2073 | shine (verb): to be bright by casting or reflecting light | loc: svítit
  EN TS: Look, the sun is shining in!
  cz TS: Koukej, dovnitř svítí slunce!
  EN FS: Look, the moon is shining in!
  cz FS: Koukej, dovnitř svítí měsíc!
  EN TP: sunlight shining in
  cz TP: dovnitř svítí slunce
  EN FP: moonlight shining in
  cz FP: dovnitř svítí měsíc
2075 | windowsill (noun): the flat shelf at the bottom of a window | loc: okenní parapet
  EN TS: Books sit on the windowsill.
  cz TS: Na okenním parapetu jsou knihy.
  EN FS: Cats sit on the windowsill.
  cz FS: Na okenním parapetu jsou kočky.
  EN TP: books on a windowsill
  cz TP: knihy na okenním parapetu
  EN FP: plants on a windowsill
  cz FP: rostliny na okenním parapetu
2076 | literature (noun): written works such as novels, poems and stories | loc: literatura
  EN TS: So much literature, so little time.
  cz TS: Tolik literatury, tak málo času.
  EN FS: So many pizzas, so little time.
  cz FS: Tolik pizzy, tak málo času.
  EN TP: shelves of old literature
  cz TP: police staré literatury
  EN FP: literature on a phone
  cz FP: literatura v mobilu
2077 | stare (verb): to look at something for a long time | loc: zírat
  EN TS: The owl is staring at me!
  cz TS: Ta sova na mě zírá!
  EN FS: The cat is staring at me!
  cz FS: Ta kočka na mě zírá!
  EN TP: staring at the viewer
  cz TP: zírá na diváka
  EN FP: staring at the moon
  cz FP: zírá na měsíc
2078 | flame (noun): the bright burning part of a fire or candle | loc: plamen
  EN TS: Two flames light the book.
  cz TS: Knihu osvětlují dva plameny.
  EN FS: Three flames light the book.
  cz FS: Knihu osvětlují tři plameny.
  EN TP: two candle flames
  cz TP: dva plameny svíček
  EN FP: flames in a fireplace
  cz FP: plameny v krbu
2079 | wooden (adjective): made of wood | loc: dřevěný
  EN TS: Everything here is wooden.
  cz TS: Všechno tady je dřevěné.
  EN FS: Everything here is plastic.
  cz FS: Všechno tady je plastové.
  EN TP: tall wooden bookcases
  cz TP: vysoké dřevěné knihovny
  EN FP: tall wooden ladders
  cz FP: vysoké dřevěné žebříky
2080 | pagoda (noun): an Asian temple with tiered curved roofs | loc: pagoda
  EN TS: Snow is falling on the pagoda.
  cz TS: Na pagodu padá sníh.
  EN FS: Rain is falling on the pagoda.
  cz FS: Na pagodu padá déšť.
  EN TP: a red pagoda in snow
  cz TP: červená pagoda ve sněhu
  EN FP: a pagoda in the jungle
  cz FP: pagoda v džungli
2081 | stepping stones (noun): flat stones you step on to cross water | loc: nášlapné kameny
  EN TS: Stepping stones cross a lake.
  cz TS: Nášlapné kameny vedou přes jezero.
  EN FS: Stepping stones cross a road.
  cz FS: Nášlapné kameny vedou přes silnici.
  EN TP: stepping stones across water
  cz TP: nášlapné kameny přes vodu
  EN FP: stepping stones in a garden
  cz FP: nášlapné kameny v zahradě
2082 | cane (noun): a thin stick you lean on while walking | loc: hůl
  EN TS: He is holding a thin cane.
  cz TS: Drží tenkou hůl.
  EN FS: He is holding a thin pipe.
  cz FS: Drží tenkou dýmku.
  EN TP: holding a walking cane
  cz TP: drží vycházkovou hůl
  EN FP: a cane in the snow
  cz FP: hůl ve sněhu
2084 | railway (noun): the line that runs trains for passengers | loc: železnice
  EN TS: A train on a wet railway.
  cz TS: Vlak na mokré železnici.
  EN FS: A train on a dry railway.
  cz FS: Vlak na suché železnici.
  EN TP: a railway at night
  cz TP: železnice v noci
  EN FP: a railway in the desert
  cz FP: železnice v poušti
2086 | festive (adjective): cheerful and decorated for a celebration | loc: sváteční
  EN TS: The street looks so festive!
  cz TS: Ta ulice je fakt sváteční!
  EN FS: The street looks so sunny!
  cz FS: Ta ulice je fakt slunečná!
  EN TP: a festive snowy street
  cz TP: sváteční zasněžená ulice
  EN FP: a festive dinner table
  cz FP: sváteční večeře
2087 | skyline (noun): the outline of a city against the sky | loc: panorama města
  EN TS: A foggy steampunk skyline.
  cz TS: Zamlžené steampunkové panorama města.
  EN FS: A foggy desert skyline.
  cz FS: Zamlžené pouštní panorama města.
  EN TP: a skyline in the fog
  cz TP: panorama města v mlze
  EN FP: a skyline at midnight
  cz FP: panorama města o půlnoci
2088 | handsome (adjective): good-looking, used about a man | loc: hezký
  EN TS: The handsome man has a beard.
  cz TS: Ten hezký muž má plnovous.
  EN FS: The handsome man has glasses.
  cz FS: Ten hezký muž má brýle.
  EN TP: a handsome bearded man
  cz TP: hezký muž s plnovousem
  EN FP: a handsome man with glasses
  cz FP: hezký muž s brýlemi
2089 | antlers (noun): the branching horns on a deer's head | loc: parohy
  EN TS: Man, those antlers are huge.
  cz TS: Kámo, ty parohy jsou obří.
  EN FS: Man, those antlers are tiny.
  cz FS: Kámo, ty parohy jsou maličké.
  EN TP: huge branching antlers
  cz TP: obří rozvětvené parohy
  EN FP: antlers on the wall
  cz FP: parohy na zdi
2091 | pine tree (noun): a tall tree with needles and cones | loc: borovice
  EN TS: The pine tree stands alone.
  cz TS: Borovice stojí osamoceně.
  EN FS: The palm tree stands alone.
  cz FS: Palma stojí osamoceně.
  EN TP: a frosty pine tree
  cz TP: ojíněná borovice
  EN FP: a pine tree with lights
  cz FP: borovice se světýlky
2092 | fluffy (adjective): soft and light, like fur or feathers | loc: chlupatý
  EN TS: What a fluffy owl!
  cz TS: Jaká chlupatá sova!
  EN FS: What a fluffy cat!
  cz FS: Jaká chlupatá kočka!
  EN TP: a fluffy blue owl
  cz TP: chlupatá modrá sova
  EN FP: a fluffy blue blanket
  cz FP: chlupatá modrá deka
2093 | green (adjective): the color between blue and yellow | loc: zelený
  EN TS: The whole city is green.
  cz TS: Celé město je zelené.
  EN FS: The whole city is grey.
  cz FS: Celé město je šedé.
  EN TP: green towers full of trees
  cz TP: zelené věže plné stromů
  EN FP: green paint on the towers
  cz FP: zelená barva na věžích
2095 | long (adjective): measuring a lot from one end to the other | loc: dlouhý
  EN TS: Her long hair is teal.
  cz TS: Její dlouhé vlasy jsou modrozelené.
  EN FS: Her long hair is black.
  cz FS: Její dlouhé vlasy jsou černé.
  EN TP: long flowing teal hair
  cz TP: dlouhé vlající modrozelené vlasy
  EN FP: a long walk
  cz FP: dlouhá procházka
2096 | red (adjective): the color at the end of the spectrum | loc: červený
  EN TS: Even the sky is red!
  cz TS: I obloha je červená!
  EN FS: Even the sky is green!
  cz FS: I obloha je zelená!
  EN TP: a red desert sky
  cz TP: červená pouštní obloha
  EN FP: a red sports car
  cz FP: červené sportovní auto
2097 | ear (noun): the part of your head you hear with | loc: ucho | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: Those ears are bigger than its head!
  cz TS: Ty uši jsou větší než jeho hlava!
  EN FS: Those eyes are bigger than its head!
  cz FS: Ty oči jsou větší než jeho hlava!
  EN TP: enormous round ears
  cz TP: obrovské kulaté uši
  EN FP: ears under a hat
  cz FP: uši pod čepicí
2099 | tree house (noun): a small hut built high up among branches | loc: domek na stromě
  EN TS: This tree house is so cool!
  cz TS: Tenhle domek na stromě je fakt cool!
  EN FS: This dog house is so cool!
  cz FS: Tahle psí bouda je fakt cool!
  EN TP: a jungle tree house
  cz TP: domek na stromě v džungli
  EN FP: a garden tree house
  cz FP: domek na stromě na zahradě
2100 | gown (noun): a long formal dress worn to a ball | loc: večerní šaty
  EN TS: Her gown is bigger than the garden!
  cz TS: Její večerní šaty jsou větší než zahrada!
  EN FS: Her hat is bigger than the garden!
  cz FS: Její klobouk je větší než zahrada!
  EN TP: a huge blue ball gown
  cz TP: obří modré večerní šaty
  EN FP: a gown on a hanger
  cz FP: večerní šaty na ramínku
2101 | together (adverb): with each other, close or touching | loc: spolu
  EN TS: They are walking together.
  cz TS: Jdou spolu.
  EN FS: They are running together.
  cz FS: Běží spolu.
  EN TP: walking close together
  cz TP: jdou těsně spolu
  EN FP: sitting together in a cafe
  cz FP: sedí spolu v kavárně
2102 | collection (noun): a large group of similar things kept together | loc: sbírka
  EN TS: What a book collection!
  cz TS: To je ale sbírka knih!
  EN FS: What a shoe collection!
  cz FS: To je ale sbírka bot!
  EN TP: a collection of old books
  cz TP: sbírka starých knih
  EN FP: a collection of old coins
  cz FP: sbírka starých mincí
2104 | jewelry (noun): necklaces, earrings and rings that you wear | loc: šperky
  EN TS: So much gold jewelry!
  cz TS: Tolik zlatých šperků!
  EN FS: So much silver jewelry!
  cz FS: Tolik stříbrných šperků!
  EN TP: covered in gold jewelry
  cz TP: ověšená zlatými šperky
  EN FP: selling gold jewelry
  cz FP: prodává zlaté šperky
2105 | pile (noun): a heap of things placed on top of each other | loc: hromada
  EN TS: The piles of books might fall.
  cz TS: Hromady knih můžou spadnout.
  EN FS: The piles of cups might fall.
  cz FS: Hromady hrnků můžou spadnout.
  EN TP: leaning piles of books
  cz TP: nakloněné hromady knih
  EN FP: a pile of clothes
  cz FP: hromada oblečení
2107 | spaceship (noun): a large vehicle that travels through space | loc: vesmírná loď
  EN TS: Where is everyone on this spaceship?
  cz TS: Kde jsou všichni na téhle vesmírné lodi?
  EN FS: Where is everyone on this train?
  cz FS: Kde jsou všichni v tomhle vlaku?
  EN TP: inside a spaceship
  cz TP: uvnitř vesmírné lodi
  EN FP: a spaceship landing
  cz FP: přistávající vesmírná loď
2108 | pipe (noun): a tube that carries water or gas | loc: trubka
  EN TS: Pipes run along the ceiling.
  cz TS: Po stropě vedou trubky.
  EN FS: Wires run along the ceiling.
  cz FS: Po stropě vedou dráty.
  EN TP: pipes along the ceiling
  cz TP: trubky podél stropu
  EN FP: pipes under the floor
  cz FP: trubky pod podlahou
2109 | tidy (adjective): arranged neatly and in good order | loc: uklizený
  EN TS: The books stand in tidy rows.
  cz TS: Knihy jsou uklizené v řadách.
  EN FS: The cups stand in tidy rows.
  cz FS: Hrnky jsou uklizené v řadách.
  EN TP: tidy rows of books
  cz TP: uklizené řady knih
  EN FP: a tidy desk
  cz FP: uklizený stůl
2110 | silhouette (noun): a dark outline against a bright background | loc: silueta
  EN TS: Dark silhouette, neon city. Batman?
  cz TS: Temná silueta, neonové město. Batman?
  EN FS: Dark silhouette, sunny beach. Batman?
  cz FS: Temná silueta, slunná pláž. Batman?
  EN TP: a silhouette in a coat
  cz TP: silueta v kabátě
  EN FP: a silhouette of a cat
  cz FP: silueta kočky
2112 | blazer (noun): a smart formal jacket worn over a shirt | loc: sako
  EN TS: Her blazer is bright yellow.
  cz TS: Její sako je jasně žluté.
  EN FS: Her blazer is dark green.
  cz FS: Její sako je tmavě zelené.
  EN TP: a bright yellow blazer
  cz TP: jasně žluté sako
  EN FP: taking off a blazer
  cz FP: svléká si sako
2113 | yellow (adjective): the color between green and orange | loc: žlutý
  EN TS: The flowers are bright yellow.
  cz TS: Květiny jsou jasně žluté.
  EN FS: The flowers are bright purple.
  cz FS: Květiny jsou jasně fialové.
  EN TP: a dove on yellow flowers
  cz TP: holubice na žlutých květech
  EN FP: yellow flowers in a vase
  cz FP: žluté květiny ve váze
2114 | across (preposition): from one side to the other side | loc: přes
  EN TS: A bridge across the stream.
  cz TS: Most přes potok.
  EN FS: A bridge across the road.
  cz FS: Most přes silnici.
  EN TP: a bridge across a stream
  cz TP: most přes potok
  EN FP: a house across the street
  cz FP: dům přes ulici
2115 | yoga (noun): calm stretching poses with slow breathing | loc: jóga
  EN TS: A calm yoga pose.
  cz TS: Klidná pozice z jógy.
  EN FS: A calm dance pose.
  cz FS: Klidná pozice z tance.
  EN TP: a cross-legged yoga pose
  cz TP: jóga v tureckém sedu
  EN FP: yoga on a paddleboard
  cz FP: jóga na paddleboardu
2116 | seaweed (noun): green plants that grow in the sea | loc: mořské řasy
  EN TS: Seaweed is floating around her.
  cz TS: Kolem ní plavou mořské řasy.
  EN FS: Plastic is floating around her.
  cz FS: Kolem ní plavou plasty.
  EN TP: seaweed around her head
  cz TP: mořské řasy kolem hlavy
  EN FP: seaweed on a sushi roll
  cz FP: mořské řasy na sushi
2117 | pocket watch (noun): a round watch carried on a chain | loc: kapesní hodinky
  EN TS: No phone, just a pocket watch.
  cz TS: Žádný mobil, jen kapesní hodinky.
  EN FS: No phone, just a wrist watch.
  cz FS: Žádný mobil, jen náramkové hodinky.
  EN TP: a golden pocket watch
  cz TP: zlaté kapesní hodinky
  EN FP: checking a pocket watch
  cz FP: kouká na kapesní hodinky
2118 | fancy (adjective): decorated, expensive-looking and not plain | loc: nóbl
  EN TS: Such fancy golden shops!
  cz TS: Takové nóbl zlaté obchody!
  EN FS: Such fancy silver shops!
  cz FS: Takové nóbl stříbrné obchody!
  EN TP: fancy golden shopfronts
  cz TP: nóbl zlaté výlohy
  EN FP: a fancy dress party
  cz FP: maškarní večírek
2119 | pattern (noun): a repeated design of shapes and colors | loc: vzor
  EN TS: The owl has red patterns.
  cz TS: Sova má červené vzory.
  EN FS: The owl has green patterns.
  cz FS: Sova má zelené vzory.
  EN TP: feather patterns
  cz TP: vzory na peří
  EN FP: patterns on a dress
  cz FP: vzory na šatech
2120 | perch (verb): to sit on a branch or a ledge, like a bird | loc: sedět na větvi
  EN TS: A bird is perched on a twig.
  cz TS: Pták sedí na tenké větvi.
  EN FS: A bird is perched on a wire.
  cz FS: Pták sedí na drátě.
  EN TP: perched on a blossom branch
  cz TP: sedí na rozkvetlé větvi
  EN FP: perched on a window sill
  cz FP: sedí na parapetu
2121 | heavy (adjective): of great physical weight | loc: těžký
  EN TS: Heavy rocks, perfect balance.
  cz TS: Těžké kameny, dokonalá rovnováha.
  EN FS: Heavy bricks, perfect balance.
  cz FS: Těžké cihly, dokonalá rovnováha.
  EN TP: a tower of heavy rocks
  cz TP: věž z těžkých kamenů
  EN FP: a heavy bag of rocks
  cz FP: těžká taška kamenů
2123 | factory (noun): a building where machines make things | loc: továrna
  EN TS: This factory touches the sky.
  cz TS: Tahle továrna se dotýká nebe.
  EN FS: This factory touches the sea.
  cz FS: Tahle továrna se dotýká moře.
  EN TP: a giant steampunk factory
  cz TP: obří steampunková továrna
  EN FP: a tiny steampunk factory
  cz FP: malinká steampunková továrna
2124 | road (noun): an open public way for travel by vehicles | loc: silnice
  EN TS: She is walking on a wet road.
  cz TS: Jde po mokré silnici.
  EN FS: She is walking on a wet beach.
  cz FS: Jde po mokré pláži.
  EN TP: walking down a country road
  cz TP: jde po venkovské silnici
  EN FP: driving down a country road
  cz FP: jede po venkovské silnici
2126 | spill (verb): to let liquid fall out of a container | loc: rozlít
  EN TS: The kitten spilled the coffee!
  cz TS: Kotě rozlilo kafe!
  EN FS: The kitten spilled the milk!
  cz FS: Kotě rozlilo mléko!
  EN TP: spilled coffee on the table
  cz TP: rozlité kafe na stole
  EN FP: spilling paint on the floor
  cz FP: rozlitá barva na podlaze
2127 | table (noun): furniture with a flat top and legs | loc: stůl | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: There is a book on the table.
  cz TS: Na stole je kniha.
  EN FS: There is a cat on the table.
  cz FS: Na stole je kočka.
  EN TP: a carved wooden table
  cz TP: vyřezávaný dřevěný stůl
  EN FP: a table by the fire
  cz FP: stůl u krbu
2128 | shoot (verb): to hit something with a missile from a weapon | loc: střílet
  EN TS: He is shooting from a chariot!
  cz TS: Střílí z válečného vozu!
  EN FS: He is shooting from a boat!
  cz FS: Střílí z lodi!
  EN TP: shooting an arrow
  cz TP: střílí šíp
  EN FP: shooting a photo
  cz FP: cvaká fotku
2132 | abandoned (adjective): left empty and no longer used | loc: opuštěný
  EN TS: The library is abandoned.
  cz TS: Knihovna je opuštěná.
  EN FS: The school is abandoned.
  cz FS: Škola je opuštěná.
  EN TP: an abandoned library
  cz TP: opuštěná knihovna
  EN FP: an abandoned car
  cz FP: opuštěné auto
2133 | pillar (noun): a tall upright post of stone | loc: sloup
  EN TS: Stone pillars in the snow.
  cz TS: Kamenné sloupy ve sněhu.
  EN FS: Stone pillars in the sand.
  cz FS: Kamenné sloupy v písku.
  EN TP: pillars of stacked stones
  cz TP: sloupy z naskládaných kamenů
  EN FP: a pillar of a temple
  cz FP: sloup chrámu
2134 | empress (noun): a woman who rules an empire | loc: císařovna
  EN TS: The empress is not amused.
  cz TS: Císařovna nevypadá pobaveně.
  EN FS: The empress is very amused.
  cz FS: Císařovna vypadá hodně pobaveně.
  EN TP: a stern empress
  cz TP: přísná císařovna
  EN FP: an empress on a horse
  cz FP: císařovna na koni
2135 | swirl (noun): a curling, spiral shape | loc: vír
  EN TS: This cat is made of swirls.
  cz TS: Tahle kočka je z vírů.
  EN FS: This cat is made of squares.
  cz FS: Tahle kočka je ze čtverců.
  EN TP: golden swirls
  cz TP: zlaté víry
  EN FP: swirls of smoke
  cz FP: víry kouře
2136 | glove (noun): a covering for your hand with fingers | loc: rukavice
  EN TS: The red gloves look great.
  cz TS: Ty červené rukavice vypadají skvěle.
  EN FS: The blue gloves look great.
  cz FS: Ty modré rukavice vypadají skvěle.
  EN TP: red space gloves
  cz TP: červené vesmírné rukavice
  EN FP: red boxing gloves
  cz FP: červené boxerské rukavice
2137 | halo (noun): a ring of light around a holy figure's head | loc: svatozář
  EN TS: Golden halo? Very stylish.
  cz TS: Zlatá svatozář? Hodně stylové.
  EN FS: Silver halo? Very stylish.
  cz FS: Stříbrná svatozář? Hodně stylové.
  EN TP: a golden halo crown
  cz TP: zlatá svatozář jako koruna
  EN FP: a halo of dark smoke
  cz FP: svatozář z tmavého kouře
2139 | laser (noun): a narrow beam of strong light from a machine | loc: laser
  EN TS: Laser beams glow behind her.
  cz TS: Za ní září paprsky laserů.
  EN FS: Candles glow behind her.
  cz FS: Za ní září svíčky.
  EN TP: neon laser beams
  cz TP: neonové paprsky laserů
  EN FP: a laser pointer for cats
  cz FP: laserové ukazovátko pro kočky
2140 | machine (noun): a thing with moving metal parts built to work | loc: stroj
  EN TS: This place is one big machine.
  cz TS: Tohle místo je jeden velký stroj.
  EN FS: This place is one big garden.
  cz FS: Tohle místo je jedna velká zahrada.
  EN TP: a huge rusty machine
  cz TP: obří rezavý stroj
  EN FP: a huge washing machine
  cz FP: obří pračka
2141 | basement (noun): a room below ground level in a building | loc: sklep
  EN TS: Something is glowing in the basement.
  cz TS: Ve sklepě něco svítí.
  EN FS: Something is burning in the basement.
  cz FS: Ve sklepě něco hoří.
  EN TP: an open basement door
  cz TP: otevřené dveře do sklepa
  EN FP: a basement full of boxes
  cz FP: sklep plný krabic
2143 | boulder (noun): a very large rounded rock | loc: balvan
  EN TS: Boulders stacked like Lego.
  cz TS: Balvany naskládané jako lego.
  EN FS: Bricks stacked like Lego.
  cz FS: Cihly naskládané jako lego.
  EN TP: a tower of boulders
  cz TP: věž z balvanů
  EN FP: a boulder rolling downhill
  cz FP: balvan valící se z kopce
2144 | t-shirt (noun): a simple top with short sleeves and no collar | loc: tričko
  EN TS: She has a white t-shirt on.
  cz TS: Má na sobě bílé tričko.
  EN FS: She has a black t-shirt on.
  cz FS: Má na sobě černé tričko.
  EN TP: a white t-shirt and jacket
  cz TP: bílé tričko a bunda
  EN FP: a t-shirt on a hanger
  cz FP: tričko na ramínku
2146 | france (noun): the European country whose capital is Paris | loc: Francie
  EN TS: France has a purple tower.
  cz TS: Francie má fialovou věž.
  EN FS: France has a green tower.
  cz FS: Francie má zelenou věž.
  EN TP: a tower in France
  cz TP: věž ve Francii
  EN FP: a bridge in France
  cz FP: most ve Francii
2149 | ridge (noun): the long top edge of a mountain or hill | loc: hřeben
  EN TS: Ridge after ridge, all grey.
  cz TS: Hřeben za hřebenem, všechno šedé.
  EN FS: Ridge after ridge, all green.
  cz FS: Hřeben za hřebenem, všechno zelené.
  EN TP: rows of mountain ridges
  cz TP: řady horských hřebenů
  EN FP: a ridge covered in snow
  cz FP: hřeben pod sněhem
2150 | ponytail (noun): hair tied back so it hangs like a tail | loc: culík
  EN TS: Ponytail up. She will go out there.
  cz TS: Culík nahoru. Vyrazí ven.
  EN FS: Hair down. She will go out there.
  cz FS: Rozpuštěné vlasy. Vyrazí ven.
  EN TP: a ponytail at the window
  cz TP: culík u okna
  EN FP: a ponytail on a horse
  cz FP: koňský ocas
2151 | crescent (noun): the curved sliver shape of a moon | loc: půlměsíc
  EN TS: The crescent moon is chilling.
  cz TS: Půlměsíc si dává chill.
  EN FS: The full moon is chilling.
  cz FS: Úplněk si dává chill.
  EN TP: a crescent moon in clouds
  cz TP: půlměsíc v mracích
  EN FP: a crescent moon at noon
  cz FP: půlměsíc v poledne
2152 | lipstick (noun): colour you paint on your lips | loc: rtěnka
  EN TS: Her lipstick is bright red.
  cz TS: Její rtěnka je jasně červená.
  EN FS: Her lipstick is bright pink.
  cz FS: Její rtěnka je jasně růžová.
  EN TP: bright red lipstick
  cz TP: jasně červená rtěnka
  EN FP: bright pink lipstick
  cz FP: jasně růžová rtěnka
2153 | china (noun): a very big country in East Asia | loc: Čína
  EN TS: China has a flying dragon!
  cz TS: Čína má létajícího draka!
  EN FS: China has a sleeping dragon!
  cz FS: Čína má spícího draka!
  EN TP: a dragon from China
  cz TP: drak z Číny
  EN FP: a tiger from China
  cz FP: tygr z Číny
2154 | general (noun): a top military commander who leads an army | loc: generál
  EN TS: The general's beard is white.
  cz TS: Generál má bílé vousy.
  EN FS: The general's beard is black.
  cz FS: Generál má černé vousy.
  EN TP: an old general in armour
  cz TP: starý generál v brnění
  EN FP: a young general in armour
  cz FP: mladý generál v brnění
